Missouri, session 2026, HB3246.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 214.330, 469.401, 469.402, 469.403, 469.405, 469.409, 469.411,
469.413, 469.415, 469.417, 469.419, 469.421, 469.423, 469.425, 469.427, 469.429, 469.431,
469.432, 469.433, 469.435, 469.437, 469.439, 469.441, 469.443, 469.445, 469.447, 469.449,
469.451, 469.453, 469.455, 469.457, 469.459, 469.461, 469.463, 469.465, and 469.467,
RSMo, are repealed and forty-eight new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as
sections 214.330, 469.399, 469.401, 469.402, 469.403, 469.404, 469.405, 469.413, 469.415,
469.417, 469.419, 469.421, 469.423, 469.425, 469.427, 469.429, 469.431, 469.432, 469.433,
469.435, 469.437, 469.439, 469.441, 469.443, 469.445, 469.447, 469.449, 469.450, 469.451,
469.453, 469.455, 469.456, 469.457, 469.459, 469.462, 469.463, 469.464, 469.465, 469.467,
469.471, 469.473, 469.475, 469.477, 469.479, 469.481, 469.483, 469.485, and 469.487, to
read as follows:
214.330. 1. (1) The endowed care trust fund required by sections 214.270 to 214.410
shall be permanently set aside in trust or in accordance with the provisions of subsection 2 of
this section. The trustee of the endowed care trust shall be a state or federally chartered
financial institution authorized to exercise trust powers in Missouri. The contact information
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3246 2
for a trust officer or duly appointed representative of the trustee with knowledge and access to
the trust fund accounting and trust fund records must be disclosed to the office or its duly
authorized representative upon request.
(2) The trust fund records, including all trust fund accounting records, shall be
maintained in the state of Missouri at all times or shall be electronically stored so that the
records may be made available in the state of Missouri within fifteen business days of receipt
of a written request. The operator of an endowed care cemetery shall maintain a current name
and address of the trustee and the records custodian for the endowed care trust fund and shall
supply such information to the office, or its representative, upon request.
(3) Missouri law shall control all endowed care trust funds and the Missouri courts
shall have jurisdiction over endowed care trusts regardless of where records may be kept or
various administrative tasks may be performed.
2. An endowed care trust fund shall be administered in accordance with Missouri law
governing trusts, including but not limited to the applicable provisions of chapters 456 and
469, except as specifically provided in this subsection or where the provisions of sections
214.270 to 214.410 provide differently, provided that a cemetery operator shall not in any
circumstances be authorized to restrict, enlarge, change, or modify the requirements of this
section or the provisions of chapters 456 and 469 by agreement or otherwise.
(1) Income and principal of an endowed care trust fund shall be determined under the
provisions of law applicable to trusts, except that the [provisions of section 469.405 shall not
apply] trustee shall have:
(a) No power of adjustment under section 469.405;
(b) No power of conversion either from an income trust to a unitrust or from a
unitrust to an income trust under section 469.475;
(c) No power or discretion to determine or modify the unitrust rate, as
established in the terms of the endowed care trust agreement; and
(d) No discretion to determine applicable value for purposes of computing the
unitrust amount beyond that granted by law and exercised solely for reasons of
administrative convenience and not to affect the size of distributions.

In determining applicable value under section 469.473, values over a three-year period
if available, or the duration of the trust if shorter, shall be used.
(2) No principal shall be distributed from an endowed care trust fund except to the
extent that a unitrust [election is in effect with respect to such trust under the provisions of
section 469.411] amount is required by the terms of the endowed care trust fund
agreement under subdivision (6) of this subsection.

HB 3246 3
(3) No right to transfer jurisdiction from Missouri under section 456.1-108 shall exist
for endowed care trusts.
(4) All endowed care trusts shall be irrevocable.
(5) No trustee shall have the power to terminate an endowed care trust fund under the
provisions of section 456.4-414.
(6) A unitrust [election made in accordance with the provisions of chapter 469 shall
be made by the cemetery operator in the terms of the endowed care trust fund agreement
itself, not by the trustee] definition of income under sections 469.471 to 469.487 shall be
established by the cemetery operator in the terms of the endowed care trust fund
agreement itself, not by the trustee, and shall not provide for a unitrust rate exceeding
five percent per annum. The unitrust rate shall be changed only by amendment to the
agreement as provided in this section.
(7) No contract of insurance shall be deemed a suitable investment for an endowed
care trust fund.
(8) The income from the endowed care fund may be distributed to the cemetery
operator at least annually on a date designated by the cemetery operator by record, but no
later than sixty days following the end of the [trust fund] trust's fiscal year. Any income not
distributed within sixty days following the end of the trust's fiscal year shall be added to and
held as part of the principal of the trust fund. The cemetery operator may instruct by
record the trustee to distribute less than all the income distributable for the year if the
cemetery operator determines that the money is not needed.
3. The cemetery operator shall have the duty and responsibility to apply the income
distributed to provide care and maintenance only for that part of the cemetery designated as
an endowed care section and not for any other purpose.
4. In addition to any other duty, obligation, or requirement imposed by sections
214.270 to 214.410 or the endowed care trust agreement, the trustee's duties shall be the
maintenance of records related to the trust and the accounting for and investment of moneys
deposited by the operator to the endowed care trust fund.
(1) For the purposes of sections 214.270 to 214.410, the trustee shall not be deemed
responsible for the care, the maintenance, or the operation of the cemetery, or for any other
matter relating to the cemetery, or the proper expenditure of funds distributed by the trustee to
the cemetery operator, including, but not limited to, compliance with environmental laws and
regulations.
(2) With respect to cemetery property maintained by endowed care funds, the
cemetery operator shall be responsible for the performance of the care and maintenance of the
cemetery property.

HB 3246 4
5. If the endowed care cemetery fund is not permanently set aside in a trust fund as
required by subsection 1 of this section, then the funds shall be permanently set aside in an
escrow account in the state of Missouri. Funds in an escrow account shall be placed in an
endowed care trust fund under subsection 1 if the funds in the escrow account exceed three
hundred fifty thousand dollars, unless otherwise approved by the division for good cause.
The account shall be insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or comparable
deposit insurance and held in a state or federally chartered financial institution authorized to
do business in Missouri and located in this state.
(1) The interest from the escrow account may be distributed to the cemetery operator
at least in annual or semiannual installments, but not later than six months following the
calendar year. Any interest not distributed within six months following the end of the
calendar year shall be added to and held as part of the principal of the account.
(2) The cemetery operator shall have the duty and responsibility to apply the interest
to provide care and maintenance only for that part of the cemetery in which burial space shall
have been sold and with respect to which sales the escrow account shall have been established
and not for any other purpose. The principal of such funds shall be kept intact. The cemetery
operator's duties shall be the maintenance of records and the accounting for an investment of
moneys deposited by the operator to the escrow account. For purposes of sections 214.270 to
214.410, the administrator of the office of endowed care cemeteries shall not be deemed to be
responsible for the care, maintenance, or operation of the cemetery. With respect to cemetery
property maintained by cemetery care funds, the cemetery operator shall be responsible for
the performance of the care and maintenance of the cemetery property owned by the cemetery
operator.
100 (3) The division may approve an escrow agent if the escrow agent demonstrates the
101 knowledge, skill, and ability to handle escrow funds and financial transactions and is of good
102 moral character.
103 6. The cemetery operator shall be accountable to the owners of burial space in the
104 cemetery for compliance with sections 214.270 to 214.410.
105 7. Excluding funds held in an escrow account, all endowed care trust funds shall be
106 administered in accordance with an endowed care trust fund agreement, which shall be
107 submitted to the office by the cemetery operator for review and approval. The endowed care
108 cemetery shall be notified in writing by the office of endowed care cemeteries regarding the
109 approval or disapproval of the endowed care trust fund agreement and regarding any changes
110 required to be made for compliance with sections 214.270 to 214.410 and the rules and
111 regulations promulgated thereunder.
112 8. All endowed care cemeteries shall be under a continuing duty to file with the office
113 of endowed care cemeteries and to submit for prior approval any and all changes,

HB 3246 5
114 amendments, or revisions of the endowed care trust fund agreement at least thirty days before
115 the effective date of such change, amendment, or revision.
116 9. If the endowed care trust fund agreement, or any changes, amendments, or
117 revisions filed with the office, are not disapproved by the office within thirty days after
118 submission by the cemetery operator, the endowed care trust fund agreement, or the related
119 change, amendment, or revision, shall be deemed approved and may be used by the cemetery
120 operator and the trustee. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the office may
121 review and disapprove an endowed care trust fund agreement, or any submitted change,
122 amendment, or revision, after the thirty days provided herein or at any other time if the
123 agreement is not in compliance with sections 214.270 to 214.410 or the rules promulgated
124 thereunder. Notice of disapproval by the office shall be in writing and delivered to the
125 cemetery operator and the trustee within ten days of disapproval.
126 10. Funds in an endowed care trust fund or escrow account may be commingled with
127 endowed care funds for other endowed care cemeteries, provided that the cemetery operator
128 and the trustee shall maintain adequate accounting records of the disbursements,
129 contributions, and income allocated for each cemetery.
130 11. By accepting the trusteeship of an endowed care trust or accepting funds as an
131 escrow agent pursuant to sections 214.270 to 214.410, the trustee or escrow agent submits
132 personally to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state and the office of endowed care
133 cemeteries regarding the administration of the trust or escrow account. A trustee or escrow
134 agent shall consent in writing to the jurisdiction of the state of Missouri and the office in
135 regards to the trusteeship or the operation of the escrow account and to the appointment of the
136 office of secretary of state as its agent for service of process regarding any administrative or
137 legal actions relating to the trust or the escrow account, if it has no designated agent for
138 service of process located in this state. Such consent shall be filed with the office prior to
139 accepting funds pursuant to sections 214.270 to 214.410 as trustee or as an escrow agent on a
140 form provided by the office by rule.
469.399. Sections 469.399 to 469.487 shall be known and may be cited as the
"Missouri Uniform Fiduciary Income and Principal Act".
469.401. As used in sections [469.401] 469.399 to [469.467] 469.487, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Accounting period", a calendar year unless [another twelve-month period is
selected by] a fiduciary selects another period of twelve calendar months or
approximately twelve calendar months. The term includes a [portion] part of a
calendar year or [other twelve-month] another period [that] of twelve calendar months or
approximately twelve calendar months that begins when an income interest begins or ends
when an income interest ends;

HB 3246 6
(2) "Asset-backed security", a security that is serviced primarily by the cash
flows of a discrete pool of fixed or revolving receivables or other financial assets that by
their terms convert into cash within a finite time. The term includes rights or other
assets that ensure the servicing or timely distribution of proceeds to the holder of the
asset-backed security. The term does not include an asset to which section 469.423,
469.437, or 469.447 applies;
(3) "Beneficiary", includes:
(a) For a trust:
a. A current beneficiary, including a current income beneficiary and a
beneficiary that may receive only principal;
b. A remainder beneficiary; and
c. Any other successor beneficiary;
(b) For an estate, an heir, legatee, and devisee [of a decedent's estate, and an income
beneficiary and a remainder beneficiary of a trust, including any type of entity that has a
beneficial interest in either an estate or a trust]; and
(c) For a life estate or term interest, a person that holds a life estate, term
interest, or remainder or other interest following a life estate or term interest;
(4) "Court", any court in this state having jurisdiction relating to a trust, estate,
life estate, or other term interest described in subdivision (2) of subsection 1 of section
469.402;
(5) "Current income beneficiary", a beneficiary to which a fiduciary may
distribute net income, whether or not the fiduciary also may distribute principal to the
beneficiary;
(6) "Distribution", a payment or transfer by a fiduciary to a beneficiary in the
beneficiary’s capacity as a beneficiary, made under the terms of the trust, without
consideration other than the beneficiary’s right to receive the payment or transfer
under the terms of the trust. "Distribute", "distributed", and "distributee" have
corresponding meanings;
(7) "Estate", a decedent’s estate. The term includes the property of the decedent
as the estate is originally constituted and the property of the estate as it exists at any
time during administration;
[(3)] (8) "Fiduciary", includes a trustee, trust protector determined under section
456.8-808, personal representative, [trustee, executor, administrator, successor personal
representative, special administrator and any other person performing substantially the same
function] life tenant, holder of a term interest, and person acting under a delegation
from a fiduciary. The term includes a person that holds property for a successor
beneficiary whose interest may be affected by an allocation of receipts and expenditures

HB 3246 7
between income and principal. If there are two or more co-fiduciaries, the term
includes all co-fiduciaries acting under the terms of the trust and applicable law;
[(4)] (9) "Income", money or other property [that] a fiduciary receives as current
return from [a] principal [asset, including a portion]. The term includes a part of receipts
from a sale, exchange, or liquidation of a principal asset, [as] to the extent provided in
sections 469.423 to [469.449] 469.450;
[(5) "Income beneficiary", a person to whom net income of a trust is or may be
payable;
(6)] (10) "Income interest", the right of [an] a current income beneficiary to receive
all or part of net income, whether the terms of the trust require [it] the net income to be
distributed or authorize [it] the net income to be distributed in the [trustee's] fiduciary's
discretion. The term includes the right of a current beneficiary to use property held by a
fiduciary;
(11) "Independent person", a person that is not:
(a) For a trust:
a. A qualified beneficiary as defined under section 456.1-103;
b. A settlor of the trust; or
c. An individual whose legal obligation to support a beneficiary may be satisfied
by a distribution from the trust;
(b) For an estate, a beneficiary;
(c) A spouse, parent, brother, sister, or issue of an individual described in
paragraph (a) or (b) of this subdivision;
(d) A corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or other entity in
which persons described in paragraphs (a) to (c) of this subdivision, in the aggregate,
have voting control; or
(e) An employee of a person described in paragraph (a), (b), (c), or (d) of this
subdivision;
[(7)] (12) "Mandatory income interest", the right of [an] a current income
beneficiary to receive net income that the terms of the trust require the fiduciary to distribute;
[(8)] (13) "Net income", [if section 469.411 applies to the trust, the unitrust amount,
or if section 469.411 does not apply to the trust,] the total [receipts allocated to income]
allocations during an accounting period to income under the terms of a trust and sections
469.399 to 469.487minus the disbursements [made from income during the same period, plus
or minus transfers pursuant to sections 469.401 to 469.467 to or from income during the same
period] during the period, other than distributions, allocated to income under the terms
of the trust and sections 469.399 to 469.487. To the extent the trust is a unitrust under
sections 469.471 to 469.487, "net income" means the unitrust amount determined

HB 3246 8
thereunder. "Net income" includes an adjustment from principal to income under
section 469.405. The term does not include an adjustment from income to principal
under section 469.405;
[(9)] (14) "Person", an individual, [corporation, business trust,] estate, trust,
[partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture] business or nonprofit
entity, public corporation, government[,] or governmental subdivision, agency, or
instrumentality, [public corporation] or [any] other legal [or commercial] entity;
(15) "Personal representative", an executor, administrator, successor personal
representative, special administrator, or person that performs substantially the same
function with respect to an estate under the law governing the person’s status;
[(10)] (16) "Principal", property held in trust for distribution to [a remainder],
production of income for, or use by a current or successor beneficiary [when the trust
terminates];
[(11) "Qualified beneficiary", a beneficiary defined in section 456.1-103;
(12) "Remainder beneficiary", a person entitled to receive principal when an income
interest ends;
(13)] (17) "Record", information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that
100 is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form;
101 (18) "Settlor", a person, including a testator, that creates or contributes
102 property to a trust. If more than one person creates or contributes property to a trust,
103 the term includes each person, to the extent of the trust property attributable to that
104 person’s contribution, except to the extent another person has the power to revoke or
105 withdraw that portion;
106 (19) "Special tax benefit":
107 (a) Exclusion of a transfer to a trust from gifts described in 26 U.S.C. Section
108 2503(b), as amended, because of the qualification of an income interest in the trust as a
109 present interest in property;
110 (b) Status as a qualified subchapter S trust described in 26 U.S.C. Section 1361
111 (d)(3), as amended, at a time the trust holds stock of an S corporation described in 26
112 U.S.C. Section 1361(a)(1), as amended;
113 (c) An estate or gift tax marital deduction for a transfer to a trust under 26
114 U.S.C. Section 2056 or 2523, as amended, which depends or depended in whole or in
115 part on the right of the settlor’s spouse to receive the net income of the trust;
116 (d) Exemption in whole or in part of a trust from the federal generation-skipping
117 transfer tax imposed by 26 U.S.C. Section 2601, as amended, because the trust was
118 irrevocable on September 25, 1985, if there is any possibility that:

HB 3246 9
119 a. A taxable distribution, as defined in 26 U.S.C. Section 2612(b), as amended,
120 could be made from the trust; or
121 b. A taxable termination, as defined in 26 U.S.C. Section 2612(a), as amended,
122 could occur with respect to the trust; or
123 (e) An inclusion ratio, as defined in 26 U.S.C. Section 2642(a), as amended, of the
124 trust which is less than one, if there is any possibility that:
125 a. A taxable distribution, as defined in 26 U.S.C. Section 2612(b), as amended,
126 could be made from the trust; or
127 b. A taxable termination, as defined in 26 U.S.C. Section 2612(a), as amended,
128 could occur with respect to the trust;
129 (20) "Successive interest", the interest of a successor beneficiary;
130 (21) "Successor beneficiary", a person entitled to receive income or principal or
131 to use property when an income interest or other current interest ends;
132 (22) "Terms of a trust":
133 (a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subdivision, the
134 manifestation of the settlor's [or decedent's] intent regarding a trust's provisions as:
135 a. Expressed in [a manner which is] the trust instrument; or
136 b. Established by other evidence that would be admissible [as proof] in a judicial
137 proceeding[, whether by written or spoken words or by conduct];
138 (b) The trust's provisions as established, determined, or amended by:
139 a. A trustee or trust director in accordance with applicable law;
140 b. Court order; or
141 c. A nonjudicial settlement agreement under section 456.1-111;
142 (c) For an estate, a will; or
143 (d) For a life estate or term interest, the corresponding manifestation of the
144 rights of the beneficiaries;
145 (23) "Trust":
146 (a) Includes:
147 a. An express trust, private or charitable, with additions to the trust, wherever
148 and however created; and
149 b. A trust created or determined by judgment or decree under which the trust is
150 to be administered in the manner of an express trust; and
151 (b) Does not include:
152 a. A constructive trust;
153 b. A resulting trust, conservatorship, guardianship, multi-party account,
154 custodial arrangement for a minor, business trust, voting trust, security arrangement,
155 liquidation trust, or trust for the primary purpose of paying debts, dividends, interest,

HB 3246 10
156 salaries, wages, profits, pensions, retirement benefits, or employee benefits of any kind;
157 or
158 c. An arrangement under which a person is a nominee, escrowee, or agent for
159 another;
160 [(14)] (24) "Trustee", a person, other than a personal representative, that owns or
161 holds property for the benefit of a beneficiary. The term includes an original, additional,
162 or successor trustee, whether or not appointed or confirmed by a court;
163 [(15) "Unitrust amount", net income as defined by section 469.411]
164 (25) "Will", any testamentary instrument recognized by applicable law that
165 makes a legally effective disposition of an individual's property, effective at the
166 individual's death. The term includes a codicil or other amendment to a testamentary
167 instrument.
469.402. [The provisions of sections 456.3-301 to 456.3-305 shall apply to sections
469.401 to 469.467 for all purposes.] 1. Except as otherwise provided in the terms of a
trust or sections 469.399 to 469.487, sections 469.399 to 469.487 apply to:
(1) A trust or estate; and
(2) A life estate or other term interest in which the interest of one or more
persons will be succeeded by the interest of one or more other persons.
2. Except as otherwise provided in the terms of a trust or sections 469.399 to
469.487, sections 469.399 to 469.487 apply when this state is the principal place of
administration of a trust or estate or the situs of property that is not held in a trust or
estate and is subject to a life estate or other term interest described in subdivision (2) of
subsection 1 of this section. By accepting the trusteeship of a trust having its principal
place of administration in this state or by moving the principal place of administration
of a trust to this state, the trustee submits to the application of sections 469.399 to
469.487 to any matter within the scope of sections 469.399 to 469.487 involving the trust.
469.403. 1. [In allocating receipts and disbursements to or between principal and
income, and with respect to any matter within the scope of] In making an allocation or
determination or exercising discretion under sections 469.413 to 469.421, a fiduciary
shall:
(1) [Shall] Act in good faith, based on what is fair and reasonable to all
beneficiaries;
(2) Administer a trust or estate [under] impartially, except to the extent the terms of
the trust manifest an intent that the fiduciary shall or [the will] may favor one or more
beneficiaries;
(3) Administer the trust or estate in accordance with the terms of the trust, even
if there is a different provision in sections [469.401] 469.399 to [469.467] 469.487; and

HB 3246 11
[(2) May] (4) Administer [a] the trust or estate [by exercising] in accordance with
sections 469.399 to 469.487, except to the extent the terms of the trust provide otherwise
or authorize the fiduciary to determine otherwise.
2. A fiduciary's allocation, determination, or exercise of discretion under
sections 469.399 to 409.487 is presumed to be fair and reasonable to all beneficiaries. A
fiduciary may exercise a discretionary power of administration given to the fiduciary by the
terms of the trust [or the will, even if the], and anexercise of the power thatproduces a result
different from a result required or permitted by sections [469.401] 469.399 to [469.467;]
469.487 does not create an inference that the fiduciary abused the fiduciary's discretion.
[(3) Shall administer a trust or estate pursuant]
3. A fiduciary shall:
(1) Add a receiptto [sections 469.401 to 469.467 if] principal, to the extent neither
the terms of the trust [or the will do not contain a different provision or do not give] nor
sections 469.399 to 469.487 allocate the [fiduciary a discretionary power of administration]
receipt between income and principal; and
[(4) Shall add a receipt or ] (2) Charge a disbursement to principal, to the extent [that
the terms of the trust and sections 469.401 to 469.467 do not provide a rule for allocating the
receipt or disbursement to or between principal and income.
2. In exercising the power to adjust pursuant to section 469.405 or a discretionary
power of administration regarding a matter within the scope of sections 469.401 to 469.467,
whether granted by the terms of a trust, a will, or sections 469.401 to 469.467, a fiduciary
shall administer a trust or estate impartially, based on what is fair and reasonable to all of the
beneficiaries, except to the extent that the terms of the trust or the will clearly manifest an
intent that the fiduciary shall or may favor one or more of the beneficiaries. A determination
in accordance with sections 469.401 to 469.467 is presumed to be fair and reasonable to all of
the beneficiaries] neither the terms of the trust nor sections 469.399 to 469.487 allocate
the disbursement between income and principal.
4. A fiduciary may exercise the power to adjust under section 469.405, convert
an income trust to a unitrust under subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of section 469.475,
change the percentage or method used to calculate a unitrust amount under subdivision
(2) of subsection 1 of section 469.475, or convert a unitrust to an income trust under
subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of section 469.475, if the fiduciary determines the exercise
of the power will assist the fiduciary to administer the trust or estate impartially.
5. Factors the fiduciary shall consider in making the determination under
subsection 4 of this section include:
(1) The terms of the trust;
(2) The nature, distribution standards, and expected duration of the trust;

HB 3246 12
(3) The effect of the allocation rules, including specific adjustments between
income and principal, under sections 407.413 to 407.461;
(4) The desirability of liquidity and regularity of income;
(5) The desirability of the preservation and appreciation of principal;
(6) The extent to which an asset is used or may be used by a beneficiary;
(7) The increase or decrease in the value of principal assets, reasonably
determined by the fiduciary;
(8) Whether and to what extent the terms of the trust give the fiduciary power to
accumulate income or invade principal or prohibit the fiduciary from accumulating
income or invading principal;
(9) The extent to which the fiduciary has accumulated income or invaded
principal in preceding accounting periods;
(10) The effect of current and reasonably expected economic conditions; and
(11) The reasonably expected tax consequences of the exercise of the power.
469.404. 1. In this section, "fiduciary decision" means:
(1) A fiduciary’s allocation between income and principal or other
determination regarding income and principal required or authorized by the terms of
the trust or sections 469.399 to 469.487;
(2) The fiduciary’s exercise or nonexercise of a discretionary power regarding
income and principal granted by the terms of the trust or sections 469.399 to 469.487,
including the power to adjust under section 469.405, convert an income trust to a
unitrust under subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of section 469.475, change the percentage
or method used to calculate a unitrust amount under subdivision (2) of subsection 1 of
section 469.475, or convert a unitrust to an income trust under subdivision (3) of
subsection 1 section 469.475; or
(3) The fiduciary’s implementation of a decision described in subdivision (1) or
(2) of this subsection.
2. The court shall not order a fiduciary to change a fiduciary decision unless the
court determines that the fiduciary decision was an abuse of the fiduciary’s discretion.
3. If the court determines that a fiduciary decision was an abuse of the
fiduciary’s discretion, the court may order a remedy authorized by law, including under
section 456.10-1001. To place the beneficiaries in the positions the beneficiaries would
have occupied if there had not been an abuse of the fiduciary’s discretion, the court may
order:
(1) The fiduciary to exercise or refrain from exercising the power to adjust
under section 469.405;

HB 3246 13
(2) The fiduciary to exercise or refrain from exercising the power to convert an
income trust to a unitrust under subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of section 469.475,
change the percentage or method used to calculate a unitrust amount under subdivision
(2) of subsection 1 of section 469.475, or convert a unitrust to an income trust under
subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of section 469.475;
(3) The fiduciary to distribute an amount to a beneficiary;
(4) A beneficiary to return some or all of a distribution; or
(5) The fiduciary to withhold an amount from one or more future distributions
to a beneficiary.
4. On petition by a fiduciary for instruction, the court may determine whether a
proposed fiduciary decision will result in an abuse of the fiduciary’s discretion. If the
petition describes the proposed decision, contains sufficient information to inform the
beneficiary of the reasons for making the proposed decision and the facts on which the
fiduciary relies, and explains how the beneficiary will be affected by the proposed
decision, a beneficiary that opposes the proposed decision has the burden to establish
that it will result in an abuse of the fiduciary’s discretion.
469.405. 1. [A trustee may adjust between principal and income to the extent the
trustee considers necessary if the trustee invests and manages trust assets as a prudent
investor, the terms of the trust describe the amount that may or shall be distributed to a
beneficiary by referring to the trust's income, and the trustee determines, after applying
subsection 1 of section 469.403, that the trustee is unable to comply with subsection 2 of
section 469.403.] Except as otherwise provided in the terms of a trust or this section, a
fiduciary, in a record, without court approval, may adjust between income and principal
if the fiduciary determines the exercise of the power to adjust will assist the fiduciary to
administer the trust or estate impartially.
2. This section does not create a duty to exercise or consider the power to adjust
under subsection 1 of this section or to inform a beneficiary about the applicability of
this section.
3. A fiduciary that in good faith exercises or fails to exercise the power to adjust
under subsection 1 of this section is not liable to a person affected by the exercise or
failure to exercise.
[2.] 4. In deciding whether and to what extent to exercise the power [conferred by] to
adjust under subsection 1 of this section, a [trustee] fiduciary shall consider all factors the
fiduciary considers relevant [to the trust and its beneficiaries], including [the following]
relevant factors [to the extent relevant:
(1) The nature, purpose and expected duration of the trust;
(2) The intent of the settlor;

HB 3246 14
(3) The identity and circumstances of the beneficiaries;
(4) The needs for liquidity, regularity of income, and preservation and appreciation of
capital;
(5) The assets held in the trust, including the extent to which such assets consist of
financial assets, interests in closely held enterprises, tangible and intangible personal
property, or real property, and the extent to which such assets are used by a beneficiary, and
whether such assets were purchased by the trustee or received from the settlor;
(6) The net amount allocated to income pursuant to sections 469.401 to 469.467,
other than this section, and the increase or decrease in the value of the principal assets, which
the trustee may estimate as to assets for which market values are not readily available;
(7) Whether and to what extent the terms of the trust give the trustee the power to
invade principal or accumulate income, or prohibit the trustee from invading principal or
accumulating income, and the extent to which the trustee has exercised a power from time to
time to invade principal or accumulate income;
(8) The actual and anticipated effect of economic conditions on principal and income
and effects of inflation and deflation; and
(9) The anticipated tax consequences of an adjustment] in subsection 5 of section
469.403 and the application of sections 469.423, 469.435, and 469.445.
[3.] 5. A [trustee may] fiduciary shallnot exercise the power under subsection 1 of
this section to make an adjustment or under section 469.435 to make a determination that
an allocation is insubstantial if:
(1) [That diminishes the income interest in a trust which requires all of the income to
be paid at least annually to a spouse and for which an estate tax or gift tax marital deduction
would be allowed, in whole or in part, if the trustee did not have the power to make the
adjustment;
(2) That reduces the actuarial value of the income interest in a trust to which a person
transfers property with the intent to qualify for a gift tax exclusion;
(3) That changes] The adjustment or determination would reduce the amount
payable to a [beneficiary] current income beneficiary from a trust that qualifies for a
special tax benefit, except to the extent the adjustment is made to provide for a
reasonable apportionment of the total return of the trust between the current income
beneficiary and successor beneficiaries;
(2) The adjustment or determination would change the amount payable to a
beneficiary, as a fixed annuity or a fixed fraction of the value of the trust assets, under the
terms of the trust;
[(4) From any] (3) The adjustment or determination would reduce an amount that
is permanently set aside for a charitable [purposes] purpose under [a will or] the terms of [a]

HB 3246 15
the trust [to the extent that the existence of the power to adjust would change the character of
the amount] , unless both income and principal are set aside for [federal income, gift or
estate tax purposes] the charitable purpose;
[(5) If ] (4) Possessing or exercising the power [to make an adjustment causes an
individual] would cause a person to be treated as the owner of all or part of the trust for
[income tax purposes, and the individual would not be treated as the owner if the trustee did
not possess the power to make an adjustment] federal income tax purposes;
[(6)If ] (5) Possessing or exercising the power [to make an adjustment causes] would
cause all or part of the value of the trust assets to be included [for estate tax purposes] in the
gross estate of an individual [who has] for federal estate tax purposes;
(6) Possessing or exercising the power [to remove or appoint a trustee, or both,]
would cause an individual to be treated as making a gift for federal gift tax purposes;
(7) The fiduciary is not an independent person;
(8) The trust is irrevocable and [the assets would not be included in the estate of the
individual if the trustee did not possess] provides for income to be paid to the settlor and
possessing or exercising the power [to make an adjustment] would cause the adjusted
principal or income to be considered an available resource or available income under a
public-benefit program; or
[(7) If the trustee is a beneficiary of the trust; or
(8) If the trustee is not a beneficiary, but the adjustment would benefit the trustee
directly or indirectly]
(9) The trust is a unitrust under sections 469.471 to 469.487.
[4.] 6. If [subdivision (5), (6), (7) or (8) of] subsection [3] 5of this section applies to a
[trustee and there is more than one trustee, a cotrustee to whom the provision does] fiduciary:
(1) A co-fiduciary to which subdivisions (4) to (7) of subsection 5 of this section
donot apply may [make] exercisethe [adjustment] power to adjustunless the exercise of the
power by the remaining [trustee or trustees] co-fiduciary or co-fiduciaries is not permitted
by the terms of the trust or law other than sections 469.399 to 469.487; and
(2) If there is no co-fiduciary to which subdivisions (4) to (7) of subsection 5 of
this section do not apply, the fiduciary may appoint a co-fiduciary to which subdivisions
(4) to (7) of subsection 5 of this section do not apply, which may be a special fiduciary
with limited powers, and the appointed co-fiduciary may exercise the power to adjust
under subsection 1 of this section, unless the appointment of a co-fiduciary or the
exercise of the power by a co-fiduciary is not permitted by the terms of the trust or law
other than under sections 469.399 to 469.487.
[5.] 7. A [trustee] fiduciary may release [the entire power conferred by subsection 1
of this section, or may release only the power to adjust from income to principal or the power

HB 3246 16
to adjust from principal to income if the trustee is uncertain about whether possessing or
exercising the power will] or delegate to a co-fiduciary the power to adjust under
subsection 1 of this section if the fiduciary determines that the fiduciary's possession or
exercise of the power will or may:
100 (1) Cause a result described in subdivisions (1) to (6) or subdivision (8) of subsection
101 [3] 5 of this section [,]; or [if the trustee determines that possessing or exercising the power
102 will or may]
103 (2) Deprive the trust of a tax benefit or impose a tax burden not described in
104 subdivisions (1) to (6) of subsection [3] 5 of this section.
105 8. A fiduciary's release or delegation to a co-fiduciary under subsection 7 of this
106 section of the power to adjust under subsection 1 of this section:
107 (1) Shall be in a record;
108 (2) Applies to the entire power, unless the release or delegation provides a
109 limitation, which may be a limitation to the power to adjust:
110 (a) From income to principal;
111 (b) From principal to income;
112 (c) For specified property; or
113 (d) In specified circumstances;
114 (3) For a delegation, may be modified by a re-delegation under this subsection
115 by the co-fiduciary to which the delegation is made; and
116 (4) Subject to subdivision (3) of this subsection, is [may be] permanent [or for]
117 unless the release or delegation providesa specified period, including a period measured by
118 the life of an individual or the lives of more than one individual.
119 [6.] 9. Terms of a trust that deny or limit the power [of a trustee] to [make an
120 adjustment] adjust between income and principal [and income] do not affect the application
121 of this section unless [it is clear from] the terms of the trust [that the terms are intended to]
122 expressly deny [the trustee] or limit the power [of adjustment conferred by] to adjust under
123 subsection 1 of this section.
124 10. The exercise of the power to adjust under subsection 1 of this section in any
125 accounting period may apply to the current period, the immediately preceding period,
126 and one or more subsequent periods.
127 11. A description of the exercise of the power to adjust under subsection 1 of this
128 section shall be:
129 (1) Included in a report, if any, sent to beneficiaries under subsection 3 of section
130 456.8-813; or
131 (2) Communicated at least annually to the qualified beneficiaries defined under
132 section 456.1-103 other than all beneficiaries that receive or are entitled to receive

HB 3246 17
133 income from the trust or would be entitled to receive a distribution of principal if the
134 trust were terminated at the time the notice is sent, assuming no power of appointment
135 is exercised.
469.413. [After a decedent dies, in the case] 1. This section applies when:
(1) The death of an individual results in the creation of an estate[, or after] or
trust; or
(2) An income interest in a trust [ends, the following rules apply:] terminates,
whether the trust continues or is distributed.
[(1)] 2. A fiduciary of an estate or [of a terminating] trust with an income interest
that terminatesshall determine, under subsection 7 of this section and sections 469.417 to
469.462, the amount of net income and net principal receipts received from property
specifically given to a beneficiary [pursuant to the rules in sections 469.417 to 469.461 which
apply to trustees and the rules in subdivision (5) of this section]. The fiduciary shall distribute
the net income and net principal receipts to the beneficiary [who] that is to receive the
specific property[;].
[(2)] 3. A fiduciary shall determine the [remaining] income and net income of [a
decedent's] an estate or [a terminating] income interest [pursuant to the rules in] in a trust
that terminates, other than the amount of net income determined under subsection 2 of
this section, under sections 469.417 to [469.461 which apply to trustees] 469.462 and by:
[(a)] (1) Including in net income all income from property used or sold to discharge
liabilities;
[(b)] (2) Paying from income or principal, in the fiduciary's discretion, fees of
attorneys, accountants, and fiduciaries; court costs and other expenses of administration; and
interest on [death] estate and inheritance taxes and other taxes imposed because of the
decedent's death, but the fiduciary may pay [those] the expenses from income of property
passing to a trust for which the fiduciary claims [an] a federal estate tax marital or charitable
deduction only to the extent [that]:
(a) The payment of [those] the expenses from income will not cause the reduction or
loss of the deduction; [and] or
(b) The fiduciary makes an adjustment under subsection 2 of section 469.462;
and
[(c)] (3) Paying from principal [all] other disbursements made or incurred in
connection with the settlement of [a decedent's] the estate or the winding up of [a
terminating] an income interest[,] that terminates, including:
(a) To the extent authorized by the decedent's will, the terms of the trust, or
applicable law, debts, funeral expenses, disposition of remains, family allowances, [and

HB 3246 18
death taxes] estate and inheritance taxes, and other taxes imposed because of the
decedent's death; and
(b) Related penalties that are apportioned, by the decedent's will, the terms of the
trust, or applicable law, to the estate or [terminating] income interest [by the will, the terms
of the trust, or applicable law;
(3) A fiduciary shall distribute to a beneficiary who receives a pecuniary amount
outright the interest or any other amount provided by the will, the terms of the trust, or in the
absence of any such provisions, the provisions of section 473.633, from net income
determined pursuant to subdivision (2) of this section or from principal to the extent that net
income is insufficient] that terminates.
4. If a decedent's will, the terms of a trust, or applicable law provides for the
payment of interest or the equivalent of interest to a beneficiary that receives a
pecuniary amount outright, the fiduciary shall make the payment from net income
determined under subsection 3 of this section or from principal to the extent net income
is insufficient.
5. If a beneficiary is to receive a pecuniary amount outright from a trust after an
income interest ends because of an income beneficiary's death, and no payment of interest
or [other amount] the equivalent of interest is provided for by the terms of the trust or
applicable law, the fiduciary shall [distribute] pay the interest or [other amount] the
equivalent of interest to which the beneficiary would be entitled under applicable law if the
pecuniary amount were required to be paid under a will[;].
[(4)] 6. A fiduciary shall distribute [the] net income remaining after [distributions]
payments required by [subdivision (3)] subsections 4 and 5 of this section in the manner
described in section 469.415 to all other beneficiaries, including a beneficiary [who] that
receives a pecuniary amount in trust, even if the beneficiary holds an unqualified power to
withdraw assets from the trust or other presently exercisable general power of appointment
over the trust[;].
[(5)] 7. A fiduciary [may] shall not reduce principal or income receipts from property
described in [subdivision (1)] subsection 2 of this section because of a payment described in
sections 469.451 and 469.453 to the extent [that] the decedent'swill, the terms of the trust, or
applicable law requires the fiduciary to make the payment from assets other than the property
or to the extent [that] the fiduciary recovers or expects to recover the payment from a third
party. The net income and principal receipts from the property [are] shall be determined by
including [all of] the amounts the fiduciary receives or pays [with respect to] regarding the
property, whether [those amounts] the amount accrued or became due before, on, or after the
date of [a decedent's] the decedent'sdeath or an income interest's terminating event, and [by]

HB 3246 19
making a reasonable provision for [amounts that the fiduciary believes] an amount the estate
or [terminating] income interest may become obligated to pay after the property is distributed.
469.415. 1. [Each] Except to the extent sections 469.471 to 469.487 apply for a
beneficiary that is a trust, each beneficiary described in [subdivision (4)] subsection 6 of
section 469.413 is entitled to receive a [portion] share of the net income equal to the
beneficiary's fractional interest in undistributed principal assets, using values as of the
distribution date. If a fiduciary makes more than one distribution of assets to beneficiaries to
[whom] which this section applies, each beneficiary, including [one who] a beneficiary that
does not receive part of the distribution, is entitled, as of each distribution date, to a share of
the net income the fiduciary [has] received after the [date of] decedent's death [or] , an
income interest's other terminating event, or [earlier] the preceding distribution [date but
has not distributed as of the current distribution date] by the fiduciary.
2. In determining a beneficiary's share of net income under subsection 1 of this
section, the following rules apply:
(1) The beneficiary is entitled to receive a [portion] share of the net income equal to
the beneficiary's fractional interest in the undistributed principal assets immediately before
the distribution date[, including assets that later may be sold to meet principal obligations];
(2) The beneficiary's fractional interest [in the undistributed principal assets shall]
under subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be calculated [without regard to property
specifically given to a beneficiary and property required to pay pecuniary amounts not in
trust;
(3) The beneficiary's fractional interest in the undistributed principal assets shall be
calculated]:
(a) On the [basis of the] aggregate value of [those] the assets as of the distribution
date without reducing the value by any unpaid principal obligation; and
(b) Without regard to:
a. Property specifically given to a beneficiary under the decedent's will or the
terms of the trust; and
b. Property required to pay pecuniary amounts not in trust; and
[(4)] (3) The distribution date [for purposes of this section] under subdivision (1) of
this subsection may be the date as of which the fiduciary calculates the value of the assets if
that date is reasonably near the date on which the assets are [actually] distributed.
3. [If] To the extent a fiduciary does not distribute under this section all [of] the
collected but undistributed net income to each [person] beneficiary as of a distribution date,
the fiduciary shall maintain [appropriate] records showing the interest of each beneficiary in
[that] the net income.

HB 3246 20
4. If this section applies to income from an asset, a fiduciary may apply the rules in
this section[, to the extent that the fiduciary considers it appropriate,] to net gain or loss
realized from the disposition of the asset after the [date of death or] decedent's death, an
income interest's terminating event, or [earlier] the preceding distribution [date from the
disposition of a principal asset if this section applies to the income from the asset] by the
fiduciary.
469.417. 1. An income beneficiary is entitled to net income in accordance with the
terms of the trust from the date [on which the] an income interest begins. [An] The income
interest begins on the date specified in the terms of the trust or, if no date is specified, on the
date an asset becomes subject to [a trust or successive income interest]:
(1) The trust for the current income beneficiary; or
(2) A successive interest for a successor beneficiary.
2. An asset becomes subject to a trust under subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of this
section:
(1) [On the date it is transferred to the trust in the case of] For an asset that is
transferred to [a] the trust during the [transferor's] settlor's life, on the date the asset is
transferred;
(2) [On the date of a testator's death in the case of] For an asset that becomes subject
to [a] the trust [by reason] because of a [will] decedent's death, on the date of the
decedent's death, even if there is an intervening period of administration of the [testator's]
decedent's estate; or
(3) [On the date of an individual's death in the case of] Foran asset that is transferred
to a fiduciary by a third party because of [the individual's] a decedent's death, on the date of
the decedent's death.
3. An asset becomes subject to a successive [income] interest under subdivision (2)
of subsection 1 of this section on the day after the preceding income interest ends, as
determined [pursuant to] under subsection 4 of this section, even if there is an intervening
period of administration to wind up the preceding income interest.
4. An income interest ends on the day before an income beneficiary dies or another
terminating event occurs[,] or on the last day of a period during which there is no beneficiary
to [whom] which a [trustee] fiduciary may or shall distribute income.
469.419. 1. A [trustee] fiduciary shall allocate an income receipt or disbursement,
other than [one] a receipt to which [subdivision (1)] subsection 2 of section 469.413 applies,
to principal if its due date occurs before [a decedent dies in the case of] the date on which:
(1) For an estate, the decedent died; or [before]
(2) For a trust or successive interest,an income interest begins [in the case of a trust
or successive income interest].

HB 3246 21
2. [A trustee shall allocate an income receipt or disbursement to income if its] If the
due date of a periodic income receipt or disbursement occurs on or after the date on which
a decedent [dies] diedor an income interest [begins and it is a periodic due date. An income]
began, a fiduciary shall allocate the receipt or disbursement to income.
3. If an income receipt or disbursement is not periodic or has no due date, a
fiduciary shall [be treated] treat the receipt or disbursement under this section as
accruing from day to day [if its due date is not periodic or it has no due date]. The fiduciary
shall allocate to principal theportion of the receipt or disbursement accruing before the date
on which a decedent [dies] died or an income interest [begins shall be allocated to principal]
began, and shall allocate the balance [shall be allocated] to income.
[3.] 4. A receipt or disbursement is periodic under subsections 2 and 3 of this
section if:
(1) The receipt or disbursement shall be paid at regular intervals under an
obligation to make payments; or
(2) The payer customarily makes payments at regular intervals.
5. An item of income or [an] obligation is due under this section on the date [a
payment] the payer is required to make a payment. If a payment date is not stated, there is
no due date [for the purposes of sections 469.401 to 469.467].
6. Distributions to shareholders or other owners from an entity to which section
469.423 applies are [deemed to be] due:
(1) On the date fixed by or on behalf of the entity for determining [who is] the
persons entitled to receive the distribution [or,];
(2) If no date is fixed, on the [declaration] date [for] of the decision by or on behalf
of the entity to make the distribution[. A due date is periodic for receipts or disbursements
that shall be paid at regular intervals under a lease or an obligation to pay interest or if an
entity customarily makes distributions at regular intervals]; or
(3) If no date is fixed and the fiduciary does not know the date of the decision by
or on behalf of the entity to make the distribution, on the date the fiduciary learns of the
decision.
469.421. 1. [For purposes of] In this section, [the phrase] "undistributed income"
means net income received on or before the date on which an income interest ends. The
[phrase] term does not include an item of income or expense that is due or accrued[,] or net
income that has been added or is required to be added to principal under the terms of the trust.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 of this section, when a mandatory
income interest of a beneficiary ends, the [trustee] fiduciary shall pay [to a mandatory
income beneficiary who survives that date, or the estate of a deceased mandatory income
beneficiary whose death causes the interest to end,] the beneficiary's share of the

HB 3246 22
undistributed income that is not disposed of under the terms of the trust [unless the] to the
beneficiary or, if the beneficiary does not survive the date the interest ends, to the
beneficiary’s estate.
3. If a beneficiary has an unqualified power to [revoke] withdraw more than five
percent of the value of atrust immediately before [the] anincome interest ends[. In the latter
case,]:
(1) The fiduciary shall allocate to principal the undistributed income from the
portion of the trust that may be [revoked shall be added to principal] withdrawn; and
(2) Subsection 2 of this section applies only to the balance of the undistributed
income.
[3.] 4. When a [trustee's] fiduciary's obligation to pay a fixed annuity or a fixed
fraction of the value of [the trust's] assets ends, the [trustee] fiduciary shall prorate the final
payment [if and to the extent] as required [by applicable law to accomplish a purpose of the
trust or its settlor relating] to preserve an income tax, gift tax, estate tax, or other tax
[requirements] benefit.
469.423. 1. [For purposes of] In this section[, the term]:
(1) "Capital distribution" means an entity distribution of money that is a:
(a) Return of capital; or
(b) Distribution in total or partial liquidation of the entity;
(2) "Entity":
(a) Means a corporation, partnership, limited liability company, regulated investment
company, real estate investment trust, common trust fund, or any other organization [in which
a trustee has an interest, other than a trust or estate to which section 469.425 applies, a
business or activity to which section 469.427 applies, or an asset-backed security to which
section 469.449 applies.] or arrangement in which a fiduciary owns or holds an interest,
whether or not the entity is a taxpayer for federal income tax purposes; and
(b) Does not include:
a. A trust or estate to which section 469.425 applies;
b. A business or other activity to which section 469.427 applies that is not
conducted by an entity described in paragraph (a) of this subdivision;
c. An asset-backed security; or
d. An instrument or arrangement to which section 469.450 applies;
(3) "Entity distribution" means a payment or transfer by an entity made to a
person in the person’s capacity as an owner or holder of an interest in the entity.
2. In this section, an attribute or action of an entity includes an attribute or
action of any other entity in which the entity owns or holds an interest, including an
interest owned or held indirectly through another entity.

HB 3246 23
[2.] 3. Except as otherwise provided in [this section] subdivisions (2) to (4) of
subsection 4 of this section, a [trustee] fiduciary shall allocate to income:
(1) Money received [from] in an entity[.
3. A trustee shall allocate the following receipts from an entity to principal:
(1) Property other than money;
(2) Money received in one distribution or a series of related distributions in exchange
for part or all of a trust's interest in the entity;
(3) Money received in total or partial liquidation of the entity; and
(4) Money received from an entity that is] distribution; and
(2) Tangible personal property of nominal value received from the entity.
4. A fiduciary shall allocate to principal:
(1) Property received in an entity distribution that is not:
(a) Money; or
(b) Tangible personal property of nominal value;
(2) Money received in an entity distribution in an exchange for part or all of the
fiduciary’s interest in the entity, to the extent the entity distribution reduces the
fiduciary’s interest in the entity relative to the interests of other persons that own or
hold interests in the entity;
(3) Money received in an entity distribution that the fiduciary determines or
estimates is a capital distribution; and
(4) Money received in an entity distribution from an entity that is:
(a) A regulated investment company or [a] real estate investment trust if the money
[distributed] received is a capital gain dividend for federal income tax purposes[.
4. Money is received in partial liquidation:
(1) To the extent that the entity, at or near the time of a distribution, indicates that
such money is a distribution in partial liquidation; or
(2) If]; or
(b) Treated for federal income tax purposes comparably to the treatment
described in paragraph (a) of this subdivision.
5. A fiduciary may determine or estimate that money received in an entity
distribution is a capital distribution:
(1) By relying, without inquiry or investigation, on a characterization of the
entity distribution provided by or on behalf of the entity unless the fiduciary:
(a) Determines, on the basis of information known to the fiduciary, that the
characterization is or may be incorrect; or
(b) Owns or holds more than fifty percent of the voting interest in the entity;

HB 3246 24
(2) By determining or estimating, on the basis of information known to the
fiduciary or provided to the fiduciary by or on behalf of the entity, that the total amount
of money and property received by the fiduciary in [a] the entity distribution or a series of
related entity distributions is or will be greater than twenty percent of the [entity's gross
assets, as shown by the entity's year-end financial statements immediately preceding the
initial receipt.
5. Money is not received in partial liquidation, nor may it be taken into account
pursuant to subdivision (2) of subsection 4 of this section, to the extent that such money does
not exceed the amount of income tax that a trustee or beneficiary shall pay on taxable income
of the entity that distributes the money.
6. A trustee may rely upon a statement made by an entity about the source or
character of a distribution if the statement is made at or near the time of distribution by the
entity's board of directors or other person or group of persons authorized to exercise powers to
pay money or transfer property comparable to those of a corporation's board of directors.] fair
market value of the fiduciary’s interest in the entity; or
(3) If neither subdivision (1) nor (2) of this subsection applies, by considering the
factors in subsection 6 of this section and the information known to the fiduciary or
provided to the fiduciary by or on behalf of the entity.
6. In making a determination or estimate under subdivision (3) of subsection 5 of
this section, a fiduciary may consider:
(1) A characterization of an entity distribution provided by or on behalf of the
entity;
(2) The amount of money or property received in:
(a) The entity distribution; or
(b) What the fiduciary determines is or will be a series of related entity
distributions;
(3) The amount described in subdivision (2) of this subsection compared to the
amount the fiduciary determines or estimates is, during the current or preceding
accounting periods:
(a) The entity’s operating income;
(b) The proceeds of the entity’s sale or other disposition of:
a. All or part of the business or other activity conducted by the entity;
b. One or more business assets that are not sold to customers in the ordinary
course of the business or other activity conducted by the entity; or
c. One or more assets other than business assets, unless the entity’s primary
activity is to invest in assets to realize gain on the disposition of all or some of the assets;

HB 3246 25
(c) If the entity’s primary activity is to invest in assets to realize gain on the
disposition of all or some of the assets, the gain realized on the disposition;
(d) The entity’s regular, periodic entity distributions;
(e) The amount of money the entity has accumulated;
(f) The amount of money the entity has borrowed;
100 (g) The amount of money the entity has received from the sources described in
101 sections 469.433, 469.439, 469.441, and 469.443; and
102 (h) The amount of money the entity has received from a source not otherwise
103 described in this paragraph; and
104 (4) Any other factor the fiduciary determines is relevant.
105 7. If, after applying subsections 3 to 6 of this section, a fiduciary determines that
106 a part of an entity distribution is a capital distribution but is in doubt about the amount
107 of the entity distribution that is a capital distribution, the fiduciary shall allocate to
108 principal the amount of the entity distribution that is in doubt.
109 8. If a fiduciary receives additional information about the application of this
110 section to an entity distribution before the fiduciary has paid part of the entity
111 distribution to a beneficiary, the fiduciary may consider the additional information
112 before making the payment to the beneficiary and may change a decision to make the
113 payment to the beneficiary.
114 9. If a fiduciary receives additional information about the application of this
115 section to an entity distribution after the fiduciary has paid part of the entity
116 distribution to a beneficiary, the fiduciary is not required to change or recover the
117 payment to the beneficiary but may consider that information in determining whether
118 to exercise the power to adjust under section 469.405.
469.425. A [trustee] fiduciary shall allocate to income an amount received as a
distribution of income, including a unitrust distribution under sections 469.471 to
469.487,from a trust or [an] estate in which the [trust] fiduciaryhas an interest,other than [a]
an interest the fiduciary purchased [interest] in a trust that is an investment entity, and
shall allocate to principal an amount received as a distribution of principal from [such a] the
trust or estate. If a [trustee] fiduciary purchases, or receives from a settlor, an interest in a
trust that is an investment entity, [or a decedent or donor transfers an interest in such a trust to
a trustee,] section 469.423 [or], 469.449 [shall apply], or 469.450 applies to a receipt from
the trust.
469.427. 1. [If a trustee who conducts] This section applies to a business or other
activity conducted by a fiduciary if the fiduciary determines that it is in the [best interest]
interests of [all] the beneficiaries to account separately for the business or other activity
instead of:

HB 3246 26
(1) Accounting for [it] the business or other activity as part of the [trust's]
fiduciary's general accounting records[,]; or
(2) Conductingthe [trustee] business or other activity through an entity described
in paragraph (a) of subdivision (2) of subsection 1 of section 469.423.
2. A fiduciary may [maintain separate accounting records] account separately
under this section for [its] the transactions of a business or other activity, whether or not
[its] assets of the business or other activity are segregated from other [trust] assets held by
the fiduciary.
[2.] 3. A [trustee who] fiduciary that accounts separately under this section for a
business or other activity:
(1) May determine:
(a) The extent to which thenet cash receipts [shall] of the business or other activity
shall be retained for:
a. Working capital[,];
b. The acquisition or replacement of fixed assets[,]; and
c. Other reasonably foreseeable needs of the business or other activity[,]; and
(b) The extent to which the remaining net cash receipts are accounted for as principal
or income in the [trust's] fiduciary's general accounting records[. If a trustee sells assets of
the business or other activity, other than in the ordinary course of the business or activity, the
trustee] for the trust;
(2) May make a determination under subdivision (1) of this subsection
separately and differently from the fiduciary’s decisions concerning distributions of
income or principal; and
(3) Shall account for the net amount received from the sale of an asset of the
business or other activity, other than a sale in the ordinary course of the business or
other activity, as principal in the [trust's] fiduciary's general accounting records for the
trust, to the extent the [trustee] fiduciary determines that the net amount received is no
longer required in the conduct of the business or other activity.
[3.] 4. Activities for which a [trustee may maintain separate accounting records]
fiduciary may account separately under this section include:
(1) Retail, manufacturing, service, and other traditional business activities;
(2) Farming;
(3) Raising and selling livestock and other animals;
(4) [Management of] Managing rental properties;
(5) [Extraction of] Extracting minerals, water, and other natural resources;
(6) Growing and cutting timber [operations]; [and]

HB 3246 27
(7) [Activities] An activityto which section 469.447, 469.449, or 469.450 applies[.];
and
(8) Any other business conducted by the fiduciary.
469.429. A [trustee] fiduciary shall allocate to principal:
(1) To the extent not allocated to income [pursuant to] under sections [469.401]
469.399 to [469.467] 469.487, [assets] an asset received from [a transferor]:
(a) An individual during the [transferor's] individual's lifetime[, a decedent's];
(b) An estate[,];
(c) A trust [with a terminating] on termination of an income interest[,]; or
(d) A payer under a contract naming the [trust or its trustee] fiduciary as beneficiary;
(2) Except as otherwise provided in sections 469.423 to 469.450, money or other
property received from the sale, exchange, liquidation,or change in form of a principal asset[,
including realized profit, subject to sections 469.423 to 469.467];
(3) [Amounts] An amount recovered from a third [parties] party to reimburse the
[trust] fiduciarybecause of [disbursements] a disbursementdescribed in [subdivision (7) of]
subsection 1 of section 469.453 or for [other reasons] another reason to the extent not based
on [the] loss of income;
(4) Proceeds of property taken by eminent domain, [but a separate award made]
except that proceeds awarded for [the] loss of income [with respect to] in an accounting
period [during which] are income if a current income beneficiary had a mandatory income
interest [is income] during the period;
(5) Net income received in an accounting period during which there is no beneficiary
to [whom] which a [trustee] fiduciary may or shall distribute income; and
(6) Other receipts as provided in sections 469.435 to [469.449] 469.450.
469.431. To the extent [that a trustee accounts] a fiduciary does not account for
[receipts from] the management of rental property [pursuant to this section] as a business
under section 469.427, the [trustee] fiduciaryshall allocate to income an amount received as
rent of real or personal property, including an amount received for cancellation or renewal of
a lease. An amount received as a refundable deposit, including a security deposit or a deposit
that is to be applied as rent for future periods[, shall be added to principal and held subject to
the terms of the lease and is not available for distribution to a beneficiary until the trustee's
contractual obligations have been satisfied with respect to that amount.]:
(1) Shall be added to principal and held subject to the terms of the lease, except
as otherwise provided by law other than sections 469.399 to 469.487; and
(2) Is not allocated to income or available for distribution to a beneficiary until
the fiduciary’s contractual obligations have been satisfied with respect to that amount.

HB 3246 28
469.432. 1. This section does not apply to an obligation to which section 469.437,
469.439, 469.441, 469.443, 469.447, 469.449, or 469.450 applies.
2. A fiduciary shall allocate to income, without provision for amortization of
premium, an amount received as interest[, whether determined at a fixed, variable or floating
rate,] on an obligation to pay money to the [trustee] fiduciary, including an amount received
as consideration for prepaying principal[, shall be allocated to income without any provision
for amortization of premium].
[2.] 3. A [trustee] fiduciary shall allocate to principal an amount received from the
sale, redemption, or other disposition of an obligation to pay money to the [trustee more than
one year after it is purchased or acquired by the trustee, including an obligation whose
purchase price or value when it is acquired is less than its value at maturity. If the obligation
matures within one year after it is purchased or acquired by the trustee, an amount received in
excess of its purchase price or its value when acquired by the trust shall be allocated to
income] fiduciary. A fiduciary shall allocate to income the increment in value of a bond
or other obligation for the payment of money bearing no stated interest but payable or
redeemable, at maturity or another future time, in an amount that exceeds the amount
in consideration of which it was issued.
[3. This section does not apply to an obligation to which section 469.437, 469.439,
469.441, 469.443, 469.447 or 469.449 applies.]
469.433. 1. This section does not apply to a contract to which section 469.437
applies.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection [2] 3 of this section, a [trustee]
fiduciary shall allocate to principal the proceeds of a life insurance policy or other contract
[in which the trust or its trustee is named] received by the fiduciaryas beneficiary, including
a contract that insures [the trust or its trustee] against [loss for] damage to, destruction of, or
loss of title to [a trust] an asset. The [trustee] fiduciary shall allocate dividends on an
insurance policy to income [if] to the extent premiums on the policy are paid from income[,]
and to principal [if] to the extent premiums on the policy are paid from principal.
[2.] 3. A [trustee] fiduciary shall allocate to income proceeds of a contract that
insures the [trustee] fiduciary against loss of:
(1) Occupancy or other use by [an income beneficiary, loss of] a current income[,]
beneficiary;
(2) Income; or[,]
(3) Subject to section 469.427, [loss of] profits from a business.
[3. This section does not apply to a contract to which section 469.437 applies.]
469.435. 1. If a [trustee] fiduciary determines that an allocation between income
and principal [and income] required by section 469.437, 469.439, 469.441, 469.443 or

HB 3246 29
469.449 is insubstantial, the [trustee] fiduciary may allocate the entire amount to principal,
unless [one of the circumstances described in] subsection [3] 5 of section 469.405 applies to
the allocation. [This power]
2. A fiduciary may [be exercised by a cotrustee in the circumstances described in
subsection 4 of section 469.405 and may be released for the reasons and in the manner
described in subsection 5 of section 469.405.] presume an allocation is [presumed to be]
insubstantial under subsection 1 of this section if:
(1) The amount of the allocation would increase or decrease net income in an
accounting period, as determined before the allocation, by less than ten percent; [or] and
(2) [The value of] The asset producing the receipt [for which the allocation would] to
be [made is] allocated has a fair market value less than ten percent of the total fair market
value of the [trust's] assets owned or held by the fiduciary at the beginning of the
accounting period.
3. The power to make a determination under subsection 1 of this section may be:
(1) Exercised by a co-fiduciary in the manner described in subsection 6 of section
469.405; or
(2) Released or delegated for a reason described in subsection 7 of section
469.405 and in the manner described in subsection 8 of section 469.405.
469.437. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) ["Payment", an amount that is:
(a) Received or withdrawn from a plan; or
(b) One of a series of distributions that have been or will be received over a fixed
number of years or during the life of one or more individuals under any contractual or other
arrangement, or is a single payment from a plan that the trustee could have received over a
fixed number of years or during the life of one or more individuals;
(2) "Plan", a contractual, custodial, trust or other arrangement that provides for
distributions to the trust, including, but not limited to, qualified retirement plans, Individual
Retirement Accounts, Roth Individual Retirement Accounts, public and private annuities, and
deferred compensation, including payments received directly from an entity as defined in
section 469.423 regardless of whether or not such distributions are made from a specific fund
or account.
2. If any portion of a payment is characterized as a distribution to the trustee of
interest, dividends or a dividend equivalent, the trustee shall allocate the portion so
characterized to income. The trustee shall allocate the balance of that payment to principal.
3. If no part of a payment is allocated to income pursuant to subsection 2 of this
section, then for each accounting period of the trust that any payment is received by the trust
with respect to the trust's interest in a plan, the trustee shall allocate to income that portion of

HB 3246 30
the aggregate value of all payments received by the trustee in that accounting period equal to
the amount of plan income attributable to the trust's interest in the plan for that calendar year.
The trustee shall allocate the balance of that payment to principal.
4. For purposes of this section, if a payment is received from a plan that maintains a
separate account or fund for its participants or account holders, including, but not limited to,
defined contribution retirement plans, Individual Retirement Accounts, Roth Individual
Retirement Accounts, and some types of deferred compensation plans, the phrase "plan
income" shall mean either the amount of the plan account or fund held for the benefit of the
trust that, if the plan account or fund were a trust, would be allocated to income pursuant to
sections 469.401 to 469.467 for that accounting period, or four percent of the value of the
plan account or fund on the first day of that accounting period. The method of determining
plan income pursuant to this subsection shall be chosen by the trustee in the trustee's
discretion. The trustees may change the method of determining plan income pursuant to this
subsection for any future accounting period.
5. For purposes of this section if the payment is received from a plan that does not
maintain a separate account or fund for its participants or account holders, including by way
of example and not limitation defined benefit retirement plans and some types of deferred
compensation plans, the term "plan income" shall mean four percent of the total present value
of the trust's interest in the plan as of the first day of the accounting period, based on
reasonable actuarial assumptions as determined by the trustee.
6. Notwithstanding subsections 1 to 5 of this section, with respect to a trust where an
election to qualify for a marital deduction under Section 2056(b)(7) or Section 2523(f) of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, has been made, or a trust that qualified for the
marital deduction under either Section 2056(b)(5) or Section 2523(e) of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, a trustee shall determine the plan income for the accounting
period as if the plan were a trust subject to sections 469.401 to 469.467. Upon request of the
surviving spouse, the trustee shall demand that the person administering the plan distribute
the plan income to the trust. The trustee shall allocate a payment from the plan to income to
the extent of the plan income and distribute that amount to the surviving spouse. The trustee
shall allocate the balance of the payment to principal. Upon request of the surviving spouse,
the trustee shall allocate principal to income to the extent the plan income exceeds payments
made from the plan to the trust during the accounting period.
7. If, to obtain an estate or gift tax marital deduction for a trust, a trustee shall allocate
more of a payment to income than provided for by this section, the trustee shall allocate to
income the additional amount necessary to obtain the marital deduction.] "Internal income
of a separate fund", the amount determined under subsection 2 of this section;
(2) "Marital trust", a trust:

HB 3246 31
(a) Of which the settlor's surviving spouse is the only current income beneficiary
and is entitled to a distribution of all the current net income of the trust; and
(b) That qualifies for a marital deduction with respect to the settlor's estate
under 26 U.S.C. Section 2056, as amended, because:
a. An election to qualify for a marital deduction under 26 U.S.C. Section 2056(b)
(7), as amended, has been made; or
b. The trust qualifies for a marital deduction under 26 U.S.C. Section 2056(b)(5),
as amended;
(3) "Payment", an amount a fiduciary may receive over a fixed number of years
or during the life of one or more individuals because of services rendered or property
transferred to the payer in exchange for future amounts the fiduciary may receive. The
term includes an amount received in money or property from the payer’s general assets
or from a separate fund created by the payer;
(4) "Separate fund", includes a private or commercial annuity, an individual
retirement account, and a pension, profit-sharing, stock bonus, or stock-ownership plan.
2. For each accounting period, the following rules apply to a separate fund:
(1) The fiduciary shall determine the internal income of the separate fund as if
the separate fund was a trust subject to sections 469.399 to 469.487;
(2) If the fiduciary cannot determine the internal income of the separate fund
under subdivision (1) of this subsection, the internal income of the separate fund is
deemed to equal three percent of the value of the separate fund, according to the most
recent statement of value preceding the beginning of the accounting period; and
(3) If the fiduciary cannot determine the value of the separate fund under
subdivision (2) of this subsection, the value of the separate fund is deemed to equal the
present value of the expected future payments, as determined under 26 U.S.C. Section
7520, as amended, for the month preceding the beginning of the accounting period for
which the computation is made.
3. A fiduciary shall allocate a payment received from a separate fund during an
accounting period to income, to the extent of the internal income of the separate fund
during the period, and the balance to principal.
4. The fiduciary of a marital trust shall:
(1) Withdraw from a separate fund the amount the current income beneficiary
of the trust requests the fiduciary to withdraw, not greater than the amount by which
the internal income of the separate fund during the accounting period exceeds the
amount the fiduciary otherwise receives from the separate fund during the period;
(2) Transfer from principal to income the amount the current income
beneficiary requests the fiduciary to transfer, not greater than the amount by which

HB 3246 32
the internal income of the separate fund during the period exceeds the amount the
fiduciary receives from the separate fund during the period after the application of
subdivision (1) of this subsection; and
(3) Distribute to the current income beneficiary as income:
(a) The amount of the internal income of the separate fund received or
withdrawn during the period; and
100 (b) The amount transferred from principal to income under subdivision (2) of
101 this subsection.
102 5. For a trust, other than a marital trust, of which one or more current income
103 beneficiaries are entitled to a distribution of all the current net income, the fiduciary
104 shall transfer from principal to income the amount by which the internal income of a
105 separate fund during the accounting period exceeds the amount the fiduciary receives
106 from the separate fund during the period.
469.439. 1. [As used] In this section, [the phrase] "liquidating asset" means an asset
whose value will diminish or terminate because the asset is expected to produce receipts for a
[period of] limited [duration] time. The [phrase] term includes a leasehold, patent,
copyright, royalty right, and right to receive payments during a period of more than one year
under an arrangement that does not provide for the payment of interest on the unpaid balance.
[The phrase]
2. This section does not [include a payment] apply to a receipt subject to section
469.423, 469.437, [resources subject to section] 469.441, [timber subject to section] 469.443,
[an activity subject to section] 469.447, [an asset subject to section] 469.449, 469.450,or [any
asset for which the trustee establishes a reserve for depreciation pursuant to section] 469.455.
[2.] 3. A [trustee] fiduciary shall allocate:
(1) To income [ten percent of the receipts from]:
(a) A receipt produced by a liquidating asset [and the balance], to the extent the
receipt does not exceed three percent of the value of the asset; or
(b) If the fiduciary cannot determine the value of the asset, ten percent of the
receipt; and
(2) To principal, the balance of the receipt.
469.441. 1. To the extent [that a trustee accounts for receipts] a fiduciary does not
account for a receiptfrom an interest in minerals, water,or other natural resources [pursuant
to this section] as a business under section 469.427, the [trustee] fiduciary shall allocate
[them as follows] the receipt:
(1) [If] To income, to the extent received:
(a) As [nominal] delay rental or [nominal] annual rent on a lease[, a receipt shall be
allocated to income];

HB 3246 33
(b) As a factor for interest or the equivalent of interest under an agreement
creating a production payment; or
(c) On account of an interest in renewable water;
(2) To principal, if received from a production payment, [a receipt shall be allocated
to income if and to the extent that the agreement creating the production payment provides a
factor for interest or its equivalent. The balance shall be allocated to principal;] to the extent
paragraph (b) of subdivision (1) of this subsection does not apply; or
(3) [If an amount received] Between income and principal equitably, to the extent
received:
(a) On account of an interest in nonrenewable water;
(b) As a royalty, shut-in-well payment, take-or-pay payment, or bonus [or delay
rental is more than nominal, ninety percent shall be allocated to principal and the balance to
income]; or
[(4) If an amount is received] (c) From a working interest or any other interest not
provided for in subdivision (1)[,] or (2) [or (3)] of this subsection[, ninety percent of the net
amount received shall be allocated to principal and the balance to income] or paragraph (a)
or (b) of this subdivision.
2. [An amount received on account of] This section applies to an interest [in water
that is renewable shall be allocated to income. If the water is not renewable, ninety percent of
the amount shall be allocated to principal and the balance to income.
3. Sections 469.401 to 469.467 apply] owned or held by a fiduciarywhether or not a
[decedent or donor] settlor was extracting minerals, water, or other natural resources before
the fiduciary owned or held the interest [became subject to the trust].
3. An allocation of a receipt under subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of this section
is presumed to be equitable if the amount allocated to principal is equal to the amount
allowed by Title 26 of the United States Code, as amended, as a deduction for depletion
of the interest.
4. If a [trust] fiduciary owns or holds an interest in minerals, water, or other natural
resources [on] before August 28, [2001] 2026, the [trustee] fiduciary may allocate receipts
from the interest as provided in [sections 469.401 to 469.467] this section or in the manner
used by the [trustee] fiduciary before August 28, [2001] 2026. If the [trust] fiduciary
acquires an interest in minerals, water, or other natural resources on or after August 28,
[2001] 2026, the [trustee] fiduciary shall allocate receipts from the interest as provided in
[sections 469.401 to 469.467] this section.
469.443. 1. To the extent [that a trustee accounts] a fiduciary does not account for
receipts from the sale of timber and related products [pursuant to this section] as a business
under section 469.427, the [trustee] fiduciary shall allocate the net receipts:

HB 3246 34
(1) To income, to the extent [that] the amount of timber [removed] cut from the land
does not exceed the rate of growth of the timber [during the accounting periods in which a
beneficiary has a mandatory income interest];
(2) To principal,to the extent [that] the amount of timber [removed] cutfrom the land
exceeds the rate of growth of the timber or the net receipts are from the sale of standing
timber;
(3) [To or] Between income and principal if the net receipts are from the lease of
[timberland] land used for growing and cutting timber or from a contract to cut timber
from land [owned by a trust], by determining the amount of timber [removed] cut from the
land under the lease or contract and applying the rules in subdivisions (1) and (2) of this
subsection; or
(4) To principal, to the extent [that] advance payments, bonuses, and other payments
are not allocated [pursuant to either] under subdivision (1), (2), or (3) of this subsection.
2. In determining net receipts to be allocated [pursuant to] under subsection 1 of this
section, a [trustee] fiduciary shall deduct and transfer to principal a reasonable amount for
depletion.
3. [Sections 469.401 to 469.467 apply] This section applies to land owned or held
by a fiduciary whether or not a [decedent or transferor] settlor was [harvesting] cutting
timber from the land before the fiduciary owned or held the property [before it became
subject to the trust].
4. If a [trust] fiduciary owns or holds an interest in [timberland on] land used for
growing and cutting timber before August 28, [2001] 2026, the [trustee] fiduciary may
allocate net receipts from the sale of timber and related products as provided in [sections
469.401 to 469.467] this section or in the manner used by the [trustee] fiduciary before
August 28, [2001] 2026. If the [trust] fiduciary acquires an interest in [timberland] land
used for growing and cutting timber on or after August 28, [2001] 2026, the [trustee]
fiduciary shall allocate net receipts from the sale of timber and related products as provided
in [sections 469.401 to 469.467] this section.
469.445. 1. If a trust received property for which a gift or estate tax marital
deduction [is allowed for all or part of a trust whose] was allowed and the settlor’s spouse
holds a mandatory income interest in the trust, the spouse may require the trustee, to
the extent the trust assets [consist substantially of property that does] otherwise do not
provide the spouse with sufficient income from or use of the trust assets[, and if the amounts
that the trustee transfers from principal to income pursuant to section 469.405 and distributes
to the spouse from principal pursuant to the terms of the trust are insufficient to provide the
spouse with the beneficial enjoyment required to obtain the marital] to qualify for the
deduction, [the spouse may require the trustee] to:

HB 3246 35
(1) Make property productive of income[,];
(2) Convert property to property productive of income within a reasonable time[,];
or
(3) Exercise the power [conferred by subsection 1 of] to adjust under section
469.405.
2. The trustee may decide which action or combination of actions in subsection 1 of
this section to take.
[2. In cases not governed by subsection 1 of this section, proceeds from the sale or
other disposition of an asset are principal without regard to the amount of income the asset
produces during any accounting period.]
469.447. 1. [As used] In this section, [the term] "derivative" means a contract [or
financial], instrument, other arrangement, or a combination of contracts [and financial],
instruments, or other arrangements, the value, rights, and obligations of which [gives a
trust the right or obligation to participate in some or all changes in the price of a] are, in
whole or in part, dependent on or derived from an underlying tangible or intangible asset
[or group of assets, or changes in a rate, an index of prices or], group of tangible or
intangible assets, index, or occurrence of an event. The term includes stocks, fixed
income securities, and financial instruments and arrangements based on indices,
commodities, interest rates, [or other market indicator for an asset or a group of assets]
weather-related events, and credit default events.
2. To the extent [that a trustee] a fiduciary does not account [pursuant to section
469.427 for transactions] for a transaction in derivatives[, the trustee] as a business under
section 469.427, the fiduciary shall allocate [to principal] ten percent of receipts from the
transaction and ten percent of disbursements made in connection with [those transactions]
the transaction to income and the balance to principal.
3. Subsection 4 of this section applies if:
(1) A [trustee] fiduciary:
(a) Grants an option to buy property from [the] a trust, whether or not the trust owns
the property when the option is granted[,];
(b) Grants an option that permits another person to sell property to the trust[,]; or
(c) Acquires an option to buy property for the trust or an option to sell an asset owned
by the trust[,]; and
(2) The [trustee] fiduciary or other owner of the asset is required to deliver the asset
if the option is exercised[,].
4. If this subsection applies, the fiduciary shall allocate ten percent to income
and the balance to principal of the following amounts:
(1) An amount received for granting the option [shall be allocated to principal.];

HB 3246 36
(2) An amount paid to acquire the option [shall be paid from principal. A]; and
(3) Gain or loss realized [upon] on the exercise [of an option, including an option
granted to a settlor], exchange, settlement, offset, closing, or expiration of the [trust for
services rendered, shall be allocated to principal] option.
469.449. 1. [As used in this section, the phrase "asset-backed security" means an
asset whose value is based upon the right it gives the owner to receive distributions from the
proceeds of financial assets that provide collateral for the security. The phrase includes an
asset that gives the owner the right to receive from the collateral financial assets only the
interest or other current return or only the proceeds other than interest or current return. The
phrase does not include an asset to which section 469.423 or 469.437 applies.
2. If a trust receives a payment from interest or other current return and from other
proceeds of the collateral financial assets, the trustee] Except as otherwise provided in
subsection 2 of this section, a fiduciary shall allocate to income [the portion of] a receipt
from or related to an asset-backed security, to the extent the [payment which the] payer
identifies the payment as being from interest or other current return, and [shall allocate] to
principal the balance of the [payment to principal] receipt.
[3.] 2. If a [trust] fiduciary receives one or more payments in exchange for part or
all of the [trust's entire] fiduciary's interest in an asset-backed security [in one accounting
period, the trustee shall allocate the payments to principal. If a payment is one of a series of
payments that will result in the], including a liquidation or redemption of the [trust's]
fiduciary's interest in the security [over more than one accounting period], the [trustee]
fiduciary shall allocate [ten] to income ten percent of receipts from the [payment to
income] transaction and [the balance to principal] ten percent of disbursements made in
connection with the transaction, and to principal the balance of the receipts and
disbursements.
469.450. A fiduciary shall allocate receipts from or related to a financial
instrument or arrangement not otherwise addressed by sections 469.399 to 469.487. The
allocation shall be consistent with sections 469.447 and 469.449.
469.451. [A trustee shall make the following disbursements from income to the extent
that they are not disbursements to which paragraph (b) or (c) of] Subject to section 469.456,
and except as otherwise provided in subdivision (2) or (3) of subsection 3 of section
469.413 [applies], a fiduciary shall disburse from income:
(1) One-half of:
(a) The regular compensation of the [trustee] fiduciaryand [of] any person providing
investment advisory [or], custodial, or other services to the [trustee] fiduciary, to the extent
income is sufficient; and

HB 3246 37
[(2) One-half of all expenses] (b) An expense for [accountings] an accounting,
judicial [proceedings] or nonjudicial proceeding, or other [matters] matter that [involve]
involves both [the] income and [remainder] successive interests, to the extent income is
sufficient;
[(3) All of the other] (2) The balance of the disbursements described in
subdivision (1) of this section, to the extent a fiduciary that is an independent person
determines that making those disbursements from income would be in the interests of
the beneficiaries;
(3) Another ordinary [expenses] expense incurred in connection with [the]
administration, management, or preservation of [trust] property and [the] distribution of
income, including interest, an ordinary [repairs] repair, regularly recurring [taxes] tax
assessed against principal, and [expenses] an expense of [a] an accounting, judicial or
nonjudicial proceeding, or other matter that [concerns] involves primarily [the] an income
interest, to the extent income is sufficient; and
(4) [Recurring premiums] A premium on insurance covering [the] loss of a principal
asset or [the loss of] income from or use of the asset.
469.453. 1. [A trustee shall make the following disbursements] Subject to section
469.457, and except as otherwise provided in subdivision (2) of subsection 3 of section
469.413, a fiduciary shall disburse from principal:
(1) The [remaining one-half] balance of the disbursements described in [subdivisions
(1) and (2)] subdivisions (1) and (3) of section 469.451, after application of subdivision (2)
of section 469.451;
(2) [All of] The [trustee's] fiduciary's compensation calculated on principal as a fee
for acceptance, distribution, or termination[, and disbursements made to prepare property for
sale];
(3) [Payments] A payment of an expense to prepare for or execute a sale or other
disposition of property;
(4) A payment on the principal of a trust debt;
[(4) Expenses of a] (5) A payment of an expense of an accounting, judicial or
nonjudicial proceeding, or other matter that [concerns] involves primarily [an interest in]
principal, including a proceeding to construe the terms of the trust or protect property;
[(5) Premiums paid on a policy of] (6) A payment of a premium for insurance,
including title insurance, not described in subdivision (4) of section 469.451 of which the
[trust] fiduciary is the owner and beneficiary;
[(6)] (7) A payment of an estate[,] or inheritance [and other transfer taxes] tax or
other tax imposed because of the death of a decedent, including penalties, apportioned to
the trust; and

HB 3246 38
[(7) Extraordinary expenses incurred in connection with the management and
preservation of trust property;
(8) Expenses for a capital improvement to a principal asset, whether in the form of
changes to an existing asset or the construction of a new asset, including special assessments;
and
(9) Disbursements] (8) A payment:
(a) Related to environmental matters, including:
a. Reclamation[,];
b. Assessing environmental conditions[,];
c. Remedying and removing environmental contamination[,];
d. Monitoring remedial activities and the release of substances[,];
e. Preventing future releases of substances[,];
f. Collecting amounts from persons liable or potentially liable for the costs of [those]
activities[,] described in subparagraphs a. to e. of this paragraph;
g. Penalties imposed under environmental laws or regulations [and];
h. Other [payments made] actions to comply with [those] environmental laws or
regulations[,];
i. Statutory or common law claims by third parties[,]; and
j. Defending claims based on environmental matters[.]; and
(b) For a premium for insurance for matters described in paragraph (a) of this
subdivision.
2. If a principal asset is encumbered with an obligation that requires income from
[that] theasset to be paid directly to [the] acreditor, the [trustee] fiduciaryshall transfer from
principal to income an amount equal to the income paid to the creditor in reduction of the
principal balance of the obligation.
469.455. 1. [As used] In this section, [the term] "depreciation" means a reduction in
value due to wear, tear, decay, corrosion, or gradual obsolescence of a [fixed] tangible asset
having a useful life of more than one year.
2. A [trustee] fiduciary may transfer to principal a reasonable amount of the net cash
receipts from a principal asset that is subject to depreciation, but [may] shall not transfer any
amount for depreciation:
(1) Of [that portion] the part of real property used or available for use by a
beneficiary as a residence [or];
(2) Of tangible personal property held or made available for the personal use or
enjoyment of a beneficiary; or
[(2) During the administration of a decedent's estate; or]

HB 3246 39
(3) [Pursuant to]Under this section [if the trustee is accounting pursuant to section
469.427], to the extent the fiduciary accounts:
(a) Under section 469.439 for the asset; or
(b) Under section 469.427 for the business or other activity in which the asset is
used.
3. An amount transferred to principal under this section need not be separately held
[as a separate fund].
469.456. 1. If a fiduciary makes or expects to make an income disbursement
described in subsection 2 of this section, the fiduciary may transfer an appropriate
amount from principal to income in one or more accounting periods to reimburse
income.
2. To the extent the fiduciary has not been and does not expect to be reimbursed
by a third party, income disbursements to which subsection 1 of this section applies
include:
(1) An amount chargeable to principal but paid from income because principal
is illiquid;
(2) A disbursement made to prepare property for sale, including improvements
and commissions; and
(3) A disbursement described in subsection 1 of section 469.453.
3. If an asset whose ownership gives rise to an income disbursement becomes
subject to a successive interest after an income interest ends, the fiduciary may continue
to make transfers under subsection 1 of this section.
469.457. 1. If a [trustee] fiduciary makes or expects to make a principal
disbursement described in subsection 2 ofthis section, the [trustee] fiduciarymay transfer an
appropriate amount from income to principal in one or more accounting periods to reimburse
principal or [to] provide a reserve for future principal disbursements.
2. To the extent a fiduciary has not been and does not expect to be reimbursed by
a third party, principal disbursements to which subsection 1 of this section applies include
[the following, but only to the extent that the trustee has not been and does not expect to be
reimbursed by a third party]:
(1) An amount chargeable to income but paid from principal because [it] income is
[unusually large, including extraordinary repairs] not sufficient;
(2) [Disbursements] The cost of an improvement to principal, whether a change
to an existing asset or the construction of a new asset, including a special assessment;
(3) A disbursementmade to prepare property for rental, including tenant allowances,
leasehold improvements, and [broker's] commissions;

HB 3246 40
[(3)] (4) A periodic [payments] payment on an obligation secured by a principal
asset, to the extent [that] the amount transferred from income to principal for depreciation is
less than the periodic [payments] payment; and
[(4) Disbursements] (5) A disbursement described in [subdivision (7) of] subsection
1 of section 469.453.
3. If [the] an asset whose ownership gives rise to [the disbursements] a principal
disbursement becomes subject to a successive [income] interest after an income interest
ends, [a trustee] the fiduciary may continue to [transfer amounts from income to principal as
provided in] make transfers under subsection 1 of this section.
469.459. 1. A tax required to be paid by a [trustee] fiduciary that is based on
receipts allocated to income shall be paid from income.
2. A tax required to be paid by a [trustee] fiduciary that isbased on receipts allocated
to principal shall be paid from principal, even if the tax is called an income tax by the taxing
authority.
3. Subject to subsection 4 of this section and sections 469.456, 469.457, and
469.462,a tax required to be paid by a [trustee] fiduciaryon [the trust's] ashare of an entity's
taxable income in an accounting period shall be paid from:
(1) [From] Income and principal proportionately to the [extent that] allocation
between income and principal of receipts from the entity [are allocated to income] in the
period; and
(2) [From] Principal to the extent [that] the tax exceeds the receipts from the entity
[are allocated only to principal] in the period.
4. After applying subsections 1 to 3 of this section, [the trustee] a fiduciary shall
adjust income or principal receipts, to the extent [that] the [trust's] taxes the fiduciary pays
are reduced because [the trust receives] of a deduction for a payment made to a beneficiary.
469.462. 1. A fiduciary may make an adjustment between income and principal
to offset the shifting of economic interests or tax benefits between current income
beneficiaries and successor beneficiaries that arises from:
(1) An election or decision the fiduciary makes regarding a tax matter, other
than a decision to claim an income tax deduction to which subsection 2 of this section
applies;
(2) An income tax or other tax imposed on the fiduciary or a beneficiary as a
result of a transaction involving the fiduciary or a distribution by the fiduciary; or
(3) Ownership by the fiduciary of an interest in an entity, a part of whose taxable
income, whether or not distributed, is includable in the taxable income of the fiduciary
or a beneficiary.

HB 3246 41
2. If the amount of an estate tax marital or charitable deduction is reduced
because a fiduciary deducts an amount paid from principal for income tax purposes
instead of deducting it for estate tax purposes and, as a result, estate taxes paid from
principal are increased and income taxes paid by the fiduciary or a beneficiary are
decreased, the fiduciary shall charge each beneficiary that benefits from the decrease in
income tax to reimburse the principal from which the increase in estate tax is paid. The
total reimbursement shall equal the increase in the estate tax, to the extent the principal
used to pay the increase would have qualified for a marital or charitable deduction but
for the payment. The share of the reimbursement for each fiduciary or beneficiary
whose income taxes are reduced shall be the same as its share of the total decrease in
income tax.
3. A fiduciary that charges a beneficiary under subsection 2 of this section may
offset the charge by obtaining payment from the beneficiary, withholding an amount
from future distributions to the beneficiary, or adopting another method or combination
of methods.
469.463. In applying and construing sections [469.401] 469.399 to [469.467]
469.487, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with
respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.
469.464. Sections 469.399 to 469.487 modify, limit, or supersede the Electronic
Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7001 et seq., but do
not modify, limit, or supersede 15 U.S.C. Section 7001(c) or authorize electronic delivery
of any of the notices described in 15 U.S.C. Section 7003(b).
469.465. If any provision of sections [469.401] 469.399 to [469.467] 469.487 or [the]
its application [of these sections] to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity
does not affect other provisions or applications of sections [469.401] 469.399 to [469.467]
469.487 which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application and to this
end, the provisions of sections 469.399 to 469.487 are severable.
469.467. Sections [469.401] 469.399 to [469.467] 469.487 apply to [every] a trust or
[decedent's] estate existing or created on or after August 28, [2001] 2026, except as
otherwise expressly provided in the [will or] terms of the trust or [in] sections [469.401]
469.399 to [469.467] 469.487.
469.471. As used in sections 469.471 to 469.487, the following terms mean:
(1) "Applicable value", the amount of the net fair market value of a trust taken
into account under section 469.483;
(2) "Express unitrust", a trust for which, under the terms of the trust without
regard to sections 469.471 to 469.487, income or net income shall or may be calculated
as a unitrust amount;

HB 3246 42
(3) "Income trust", a trust that is not a unitrust;
(4) "Net fair market value of a trust", the fair market value of the assets of the
trust, less the noncontingent liabilities of the trust;
(5) "Unitrust", a trust for which net income is a unitrust amount. The term
includes an express unitrust;
(6) "Unitrust amount", an amount computed by multiplying a determined value
of a trust by a determined percentage. For a unitrust administered under a unitrust
policy, the term means the applicable value multiplied by the unitrust rate;
(7) "Unitrust policy", a policy described in sections 469.479 to 469.487 and
adopted under section 469.475;
(8) "Unitrust rate", the rate used to compute the unitrust amount for a unitrust
administered under a unitrust policy.
469.473. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 of this section, sections
469.471 to 469.487 apply to:
(1) An income trust, unless the terms of the trust expressly prohibit use of
sections 469.471 to 469.487 by a specific reference to these sections or an explicit
expression of intent that net income not be calculated as a unitrust amount; and
(2) An express unitrust, except to the extent the terms of the trust explicitly:
(a) Prohibit use of sections 469.471 to 469.487 by a specific reference to such
sections;
(b) Prohibit conversion to an income trust; or
(c) Limit changes to the method of calculating the unitrust amount.
2. Sections 469.471 to 469.487 do not apply to a trust described in 26 U.S.C.
Section 170(f)(2)(B), 642(c)(5), 664(d), 2702(a)(3)(A)(ii) or (iii), or 2702(b), as amended.
3. An income trust to which sections 469.471 to 469.487 apply under subdivision
(1) of subsection 1 of this section may be converted to a unitrust under sections 469.471
to 469.487 regardless of the terms of the trust concerning distributions. Conversion to a
unitrust under sections 469.471 to 469.487 does not affect other terms of the trust
concerning distributions of income or principal.
4. Sections 469.471 to 469.487 apply to an estate only to the extent a trust is a
beneficiary of the estate. To the extent of the trust’s interest in the estate, the estate may
be administered as a unitrust, the administration of the estate as a unitrust may be
discontinued, or the percentage or method used to calculate the unitrust amount may be
changed, in the same manner as for a trust under sections 469.471 to 469.487.
5. Sections 469.471 to 469.487 do not create a duty to take or consider action
under sections 469.471 to 469.487 or to inform a beneficiary about the applicability of
sections 469.471 to 469.487.

HB 3246 43
6. A fiduciary that in good faith takes or fails to take an action under sections
469.471 to 469.487 is not liable to a person affected by the action or inaction.
469.475. 1. A fiduciary, without court approval, by complying with subsections 2
and 6 of this section, may:
(1) Convert an income trust to a unitrust if the fiduciary adopts in a record a
unitrust policy for the trust providing:
(a) That in administering the trust the net income of the trust will be a unitrust
amount rather than net income determined without regard to sections 469.471 to
469.487; and
(b) The percentage and method used to calculate the unitrust amount;
(2) Change the percentage or method used to calculate a unitrust amount for a
unitrust if the fiduciary adopts in a record a unitrust policy or an amendment or
replacement of a unitrust policy providing changes in the percentage or method used to
calculate the unitrust amount; or
(3) Convert a unitrust to an income trust if the fiduciary adopts in a record a
determination that, in administering the trust, the net income of the trust will be net
income determined without regard to sections 469.471 to 469.487 rather than a unitrust
amount.
2. A fiduciary may take an action under subsection 1 of this section if:
(1) The fiduciary determines that the action will assist the fiduciary to
administer a trust impartially;
(2) The fiduciary sends a notice in a record, in the manner required by section
469.477, describing and proposing to take the action;
(3) The fiduciary sends a copy of the notice under subdivision (2) of this
subsection to each settlor of the trust that is:
(a) If an individual, living; or
(b) If not an individual, in existence;
(4) At least one member of each class of the qualified beneficiaries described
under section 456.1-103 receiving the notice under subdivision (2) of this subsection is:
(a) If an individual, legally competent;
(b) If not an individual, in existence; or
(c) Represented in the manner provided in subsection 2 of section 469.477; and
(5) The fiduciary does not receive, by the date specified in the notice under
subdivision (5) of subsection 4 of section 469.477, an objection in a record to the action
proposed under subdivision (2) of this subsection from a person to which the notice
under subdivision (2) of this subsection is sent.

HB 3246 44
3. If a fiduciary receives, not later than the date stated in the notice under
subdivision (5) of subsection 4 of section 469.477, an objection in a record described in
subdivision (4) of subsection 4 of section 469.477 to a proposed action, the fiduciary or a
beneficiary may request the court to have the proposed action taken as proposed, taken
with modifications, or prevented. A person described in subsection 1 of section 469.477
may oppose the proposed action in the proceeding under this subsection, whether or not
the person:
(1) Consented under subsection 3 of section 469.477; or
(2) Objected under subdivision (4) of subsection 4 of section 469.477.
4. If, after sending a notice under subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of this section, a
fiduciary decides not to take the action proposed in the notice, the fiduciary shall notify
in a record each person described in subsection 1 of section 469.477 of the decision not to
take the action and the reasons for the decision.
5. If a beneficiary requests in a record that a fiduciary take an action described
in subsection 1 of this section and the fiduciary declines to act or does not act within
ninety days after receiving the request, the beneficiary may request the court to direct
the fiduciary to take the action requested.
6. In deciding whether and how to take an action authorized by subsection 1 of
this section, or whether and how to respond to a request by a beneficiary under
subsection 5 of this section, a fiduciary shall consider all factors relevant to the trust and
the beneficiaries, including relevant factors in subsection 5 of section 469.403.
7. A fiduciary may release or delegate the power to convert an income trust to a
unitrust under subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of this section, change the percentage or
method used to calculate a unitrust amount under subdivision (2) of subsection 1 of this
section, or convert a unitrust to an income trust under subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of
this section, for a reason described in subsection 7 of section 469.405 and in the manner
described in subsection 8 of section 469.405.
469.477. 1. A notice required by subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of section
469.475 shall be sent in a manner authorized under section 456.1-109 to:
(1) The qualified beneficiaries defined under section 456.1-103;
(2) Each person acting as trust protector under section 456.8-808; and
(3) Each person that is granted a power over the trust by the terms of the trust,
to the extent the power is exercisable when the person is not then serving as a trustee:
(a) Including a:
a. Power over the investment, management, or distribution of trust property or
other matters of trust administration; and

HB 3246 45
b. Power to appoint or remove a trustee or person described in this paragraph;
and
(b) Excluding a:
a. Power of appointment;
b. Power of a beneficiary over the trust, to the extent the exercise or nonexercise
of the power affects the beneficial interest of the beneficiary or another beneficiary
represented by the beneficiary under sections 456.3-301 to 456.3-305 with respect to the
exercise or nonexercise of the power; and
c. Power over the trust if the terms of the trust provide that the power is held in
a nonfiduciary capacity and the power shall be held in a nonfiduciary capacity to
achieve a tax objective under Title 26 of the United States Code, as amended.
2. The representation provisions of sections 456.3-301 to 456.3-305 apply to
notice under this section.
3. A person may consent in a record at any time to action proposed under
subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of section 469.475. A notice required by subdivision (2) of
subsection 2 of section 469.475 need not be sent to a person that consents under this
subsection.
4. A notice required by subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of section 469.475 shall
include:
(1) The action proposed under subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of section 469.475;
(2) For a conversion of an income trust to a unitrust, a copy of the unitrust policy
adopted under subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of section 469.475;
(3) For a change in the percentage or method used to calculate the unitrust
amount, a copy of the unitrust policy or amendment or replacement of the unitrust
policy adopted under subdivision (2) of subsection 1 of section 469.475;
(4) A statement that the person to which the notice is sent may object to the
proposed action by stating in a record the basis for the objection and sending or
delivering the record to the fiduciary;
(5) The date by which an objection under subdivision (4) of this subsection shall
be received by the fiduciary, which shall be at least thirty days after the date the notice is
sent;
(6) The date on which the action is proposed to be taken and the date on which
the action is proposed to take effect;
(7) The name and contact information of the fiduciary; and
(8) The name and contact information of a person that may be contacted for
additional information.

HB 3246 46
469.479. 1. In administering a unitrust under sections 469.471 to 469.487, a
fiduciary shall follow a unitrust policy adopted under subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection
1 of section 469.475 or amended or replaced under subdivision (2) of section 1 of section
469.475.
2. A unitrust policy shall provide:
(1) The unitrust rate or the method for determining the unitrust rate under
section 469.481;
(2) The method for determining the applicable value under section 469.483; and
(3) The rules described in sections 469.481 to 469.487 that apply in the
administration of the unitrust, whether the rules are:
(a) Mandatory, as provided in subsection 1 of section 469.483 and subsection 1 of
section 469.485; or
(b) Optional, as provided in section 469.481, subsection 2 of section 469.483,
subsection 2 of section 469.485, and subsection 1 of section 469.487, to the extent the
fiduciary elects to adopt such rules.
469.481. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (1) of subsection 2 of
section 469.487, a unitrust rate may be:
(1) A fixed unitrust rate; or
(2) A unitrust rate that is determined for each period using:
(a) A market index or other published data; or
(b) A mathematical blend of market indices or other published data over a
stated number of preceding periods.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (1) of subsection 2 of section
469.487, a unitrust policy may provide:
(1) A limit on how high the unitrust rate determined under subdivision (2) of
subsection 1 of this section may rise;
(2) A limit on how low the unitrust rate determined under subdivision (2) of
subsection 1 of this section may fall;
(3) A limit on how much the unitrust rate determined under subdivision (2) of
subsection 1 of this section may increase over the unitrust rate for the preceding period
or a mathematical blend of unitrust rates over a stated number of preceding periods;
(4) A limit on how much the unitrust rate determined under subdivision (2) of
subsection 1 of this section may decrease below the unitrust rate for the preceding
period or a mathematical blend of unitrust rates over a stated number of preceding
periods; or

HB 3246 47
(5) A mathematical blend of any of the unitrust rates determined under
subdivision (2) of subsection 1 of this section and subdivisions (1) to (4) of this
subsection.
469.483. 1. A unitrust policy shall provide the method for determining the fair
market value of an asset for the purpose of determining the unitrust amount, including:
(1) The frequency of valuing the asset, which need not require a valuation in
every period; and
(2) The date for valuing the asset in each period in which the asset is valued.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of section
469.487, a unitrust policy may provide methods for determining the amount of the net
fair market value of the trust to take into account in determining the applicable value,
including:
(1) Obtaining an appraisal of an asset for which fair market value is not readily
available;
(2) Exclusion of specific assets or groups or types of assets;
(3) Other exceptions or modifications of the treatment of specific assets or
groups or types of assets;
(4) Identification and treatment of cash or property held for distribution;
(5) Use of:
(a) An average of fair market values over a stated number of preceding periods;
or
(b) Another mathematical blend of fair market values over a stated number of
preceding periods;
(6) A limit on how much the applicable value of all assets, groups of assets, or
individual assets may increase over:
(a) The corresponding applicable value for the preceding period; or
(b) A mathematical blend of applicable values over a stated number of preceding
periods;
(7) A limit on how much the applicable value of all assets, groups of assets, or
individual assets may decrease below:
(a) The corresponding applicable value for the preceding period; or
(b) A mathematical blend of applicable values over a stated number of preceding
periods;
(8) The treatment of accrued income and other features of an asset that affect
value; and
(9) Determining the liabilities of the trust, including treatment of liabilities to
conform with the treatment of assets under subdivisions (1) to (8) of this subsection.

HB 3246 48
469.485. 1. A unitrust policy shall provide the period used under sections
469.481 and 469.483. Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of
section 469.481, the period may be:
(1) A calendar year;
(2) A twelve-month period other than a calendar year;
(3) A calendar quarter;
(4) A three-month period other than a calendar quarter; or
(5) Another period.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 of section 469.487, a unitrust
policy may provide standards for:
(1) Using fewer preceding periods under paragraph (b) of subdivision (2) of
subsection 1 of section 469.481 or subdivision (3) or (4) of subsection 2 of section 469.481
if:
(a) The trust was not in existence in a preceding period; or
(b) Market indices or other published data are not available for a preceding
period;
(2) Using fewer preceding periods under paragraph (a) or (b) of subdivision (5)
of subsection 2 of section 469.483, paragraph (b) of subdivision (6) of subsection 2 of
section 469.483, or paragraph (b) of subdivision (7) of subsection 2 of section 469.483 if:
(a) The trust was not in existence in a preceding period; or
(b) Fair market values are not available for a preceding period; and
(3) Prorating the unitrust amount on a daily basis for a part of a period in which
the trust or the administration of the trust as a unitrust or the interest of any beneficiary
commences or terminates.
469.487. 1. A unitrust policy may:
(1) Provide methods and standards for:
(a) Determining the timing of distributions;
(b) Making distributions in cash or in kind or partly in cash and partly in kind;
or
(c) Correcting an underpayment or overpayment to a beneficiary based on the
unitrust amount if there is an error in calculating the unitrust amount;
(2) Specify sources and the order of sources, including categories of income for
federal income tax purposes, from which distributions of a unitrust amount are paid; or
(3) Provide other standards and rules the fiduciary determines serve the
interests of the beneficiaries.
2. If a trust qualifies for a special tax benefit or a fiduciary is not an independent
person:

HB 3246 49
(1) The unitrust rate established under section 469.481 shall not be less than
three percent or more than five percent;
(2) The only provisions of section 469.483 that apply are subsection 1 of section
469.483; subdivisions (1), (4), and (9) of subsection 2 of section 469.483; and paragraph
(a) of subdivision (5) of subsection 2 of section 469.483;
(3) The only period that may be used under section 469.485 is a calendar year
under subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of section 469.485; and
(4) The only other provisions of section 469.485 that apply are paragraph (a) of
subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of section 469.485 and subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of
section 469.485.
[469.409. 1. Any claim for breach of a trustee's duty to impartially
administer a trust related, directly or indirectly, to an adjustment made by a
fiduciary to the allocation between principal and income pursuant to
subsection 1 of section 469.405 or any allocation made by the fiduciary
pursuant to any authority or discretion specified in subsection 1 of section
469.403, unless previously barred by adjudication, consent or other limitation,
shall be barred as provided in this section.
(1) Any such claim brought by a qualified beneficiary is barred if not
asserted in a judicial proceeding commenced within two years after the trustee
has sent a report to that qualified beneficiary that adequately discloses the facts
constituting the claim.
(2) Any such claim brought by a beneficiary (other than a qualified
beneficiary) with any interest whatsoever in the trust, no matter how remote or
contingent, or whether or not the beneficiary is ascertainable or has the
capacity to contract, is barred if not asserted in a judicial proceeding
commenced within two years after the first to occur of:
(a) The date the trustee sent a report to all qualified beneficiaries that
adequately discloses the facts constituting the claim; or
(b) The date the trustee sent a report to a person that represents the
beneficiary under the provisions of subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of this
section.
2. For purposes of this section the following rules shall apply:
(1) A report adequately discloses the facts constituting a claim if it
provides sufficient information so that the beneficiary should know of the
claim or reasonably should have inquired into its existence;
(2) Section 469.402 shall apply in determining whether a beneficiary
(including a qualified beneficiary) has received notice for purposes of this
section;
(3) The determination of the identity of all qualified beneficiaries shall
be made on the date the report is deemed to have been sent; and
(4) This section does not preclude an action to recover for fraud or
misrepresentation related to the report.]

HB 3246 50
[469.411. 1. (1) If the provisions of this section apply to a trust, the
unitrust amount determined for each accounting year of the trust shall be a
percentage between three and five percent of the average net fair market value
of the trust, as of the first day of the trust's current accounting year. The
percentage applicable to a trust shall be that percentage specified by the terms
of the governing instrument or by the election made in accordance with
subdivision (2) of subsection 5 of this section.
(2) The unitrust amount for the current accounting year computed
pursuant to this section shall be proportionately reduced for any distributions,
in whole or in part, other than distributions of the unitrust amount, and for any
payments of expenses, including debts, disbursements and taxes, from the trust
within a current accounting year that the trustee determines to be material and
substantial, and shall be proportionately increased for the receipt, other than a
receipt that represents a return on investment, of any additional property into
the trust within a current accounting year.
(3) For purposes of this section, the net fair market values of the assets
held in the trust on the first business day of a prior accounting quarter shall be
adjusted to reflect any reduction, in the case of a distribution or payment, or
increase, in the case of a receipt, for the prior accounting year pursuant to
subdivision (1) of this subsection, as if the distribution, payment or receipt had
occurred on the first day of the prior accounting year.
(4) In the case of a short accounting period, the trustee shall prorate
the unitrust amount on a daily basis.
(5) In the case where the net fair market value of an asset held in the
trust has been incorrectly determined in any quarter, the unitrust amount shall
be increased in the case of an undervaluation, or be decreased in the case of an
overvaluation, by an amount equal to the difference between the unitrust
amount determined based on the correct valuation of the asset and the unitrust
amount originally determined.
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Average net fair market value", a rolling average of the fair
market value of the assets held in the trust on the first business day of the
lessor of the number of accounting quarters of the trust from the date of
inception of the trust to the determination of the trust's average net fair market
value, or twelve accounting quarters of the trust, regardless of whether this
section applied to the ascertainment of net income for all valuation quarters;
(2) "Current accounting year", the accounting period of the trust for
which the unitrust amount is being determined.
3. In determining the average net fair market value of the assets held in
the trust, there shall not be included the value of:
(1) Any residential property or any tangible personal property that, as
of the first business day of the current valuation year, one or more income
beneficiaries of the trust have or had the right to occupy, or have or had the
right to possess or control, other than in a capacity as trustee, and instead the
right of occupancy or the right to possession or control shall be deemed to be
the unitrust amount with respect to the residential property or the tangible
personal property; or

HB 3246 51
(2) Any asset specifically given to a beneficiary under the terms of the
trust and the return on investment on that asset, which return on investment
shall be distributable to the beneficiary.
4. In determining the average net fair market value of the assets held in
the trust pursuant to subsection 1 of this section, the trustee shall, not less often
than annually, determine the fair market value of each asset of the trust that
consists primarily of real property or other property that is not traded on a
regular basis in an active market by appraisal or other reasonable method or
estimate, and that determination, if made reasonably and in good faith, shall be
conclusive as to all persons interested in the trust. Any claim based on a
determination made pursuant to this subsection shall be barred if not asserted
in a judicial proceeding brought by any beneficiary with any interest
whatsoever in the trust within two years after the trustee has sent a report to all
qualified beneficiaries that adequately discloses the facts constituting the
claim. The rules set forth in subsection 2 of section 469.409 shall apply to the
barring of claims pursuant to this subsection.
5. This section shall apply to the following trusts:
(1) Any trust created after August 28, 2001, with respect to which the
terms of the trust clearly manifest an intent that this section apply;
(2) Any trust created under an instrument that became irrevocable on,
before, or after August 28, 2001, if the trustee, in the trustee's discretion, elects
to have this section apply unless the instrument creating the trust specifically
prohibits an election under this subdivision. The trustee shall deliver notice to
all qualified beneficiaries and the settlor of the trust, if he or she is then living,
of the trustee's intent to make such an election at least sixty days before
making that election. The trustee shall have sole authority to make the
election. Section 469.402 shall apply for all purposes of this subdivision. An
action or order by any court shall not be required. The election shall be made
by a signed writing delivered to the settlor of the trust, if he or she is then
living, and to all qualified beneficiaries. The election is irrevocable, unless
revoked by order of the court having jurisdiction of the trust. The election
may specify the percentage used to determine the unitrust amount pursuant to
this section, provided that such percentage is between three and five percent,
or if no percentage is specified, then that percentage shall be three percent. In
making an election pursuant to this subsection, the trustee shall be subject to
the same limitations and conditions as apply to an adjustment between income
and principal pursuant to subsections 3 and 4 of section 469.405; and
(3) No action of any kind based on an election made by a trustee
pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection shall be brought against the
trustee by any beneficiary of that trust three years from the effective date of
that election.
6. (1) Once the provisions of this section become applicable to a trust,
the net income of the trust shall be the unitrust amount.
(2) Unless otherwise provided by the governing instrument, the
unitrust amount distributed each year shall be paid from the following sources
for that year up to the full value of the unitrust amount in the following order:
(a) Net income as determined if the trust were not a unitrust;

HB 3246 52
(b) Other ordinary income as determined for federal income tax
purposes;
(c) Assets of the trust principal for which there is a readily available
market value; and
(d) Other trust principal.
100 (3) Additionally, the trustee may allocate to trust income for each
101 taxable year of the trust, or portion thereof:
102 (a) Net short-term capital gain described in the Internal Revenue Code,
103 26 U.S.C. Section 1222(5), for such year, or portion thereof, but only to the
104 extent that the amount so allocated together with all other amounts to trust
105 income, as determined under the provisions of this chapter without regard to
106 this section, for such year, or portion thereof, does not exceed the unitrust
107 amount for such year, or portion thereof;
108 (b) Net long-term capital gain described in the Internal Revenue Code,
109 26 U.S.C. Section 1222(7), for such year, or portion thereof, but only to the
110 extent that the amount so allocated together with all other amounts, including
111 amounts described in paragraph (a) of this subdivision, allocated to trust
112 income for such year, or portion thereof, does not exceed the unitrust amount
113 for such year, or portion thereof.
114 7. A trust with respect to which this section applies on August 28,
115 2011, may calculate the unitrust amount in accordance with the provisions of
116 this section, as it existed either before or after such date, as the trustee of such
117 trust shall determine in a writing kept with the records of the trust in the
118 trustee's discretion.]
[469.461. 1. A fiduciary may make adjustments between principal and
income to offset the shifting of economic interests or tax benefits between
income beneficiaries and remainder beneficiaries which arise from:
(1) Elections and decisions, other than those described in subsection 2
of this section, that the fiduciary makes from time to time regarding tax
matters;
(2) An income tax or any other tax that is imposed upon the fiduciary
or a beneficiary as a result of a transaction involving or a distribution from the
estate or trust; or
(3) The ownership by an estate or trust of an interest in an entity whose
taxable income, whether or not distributed, is includable in the taxable income
of the estate, trust or a beneficiary.
2. If the amount of an estate tax marital deduction or charitable
contribution deduction is reduced because a fiduciary deducts an amount paid
from principal for income tax purposes instead of deducting it for estate tax
purposes, and as a result estate taxes paid from principal are increased and
income taxes paid by an estate, trust or beneficiary are decreased, each estate,
trust or beneficiary that benefits from the decrease in income tax shall
reimburse the principal from which the increase in estate tax is paid. The total
reimbursement shall equal the increase in the estate tax to the extent that the
principal used to pay the increase would have qualified for a marital deduction
or charitable contribution deduction but for the payment. The proportionate
share of the reimbursement for each estate, trust or beneficiary whose income

HB 3246 53
taxes are reduced shall be the same as its proportionate share of the total
decrease in income tax. An estate or trust shall reimburse principal from
income.]
✔